

#196 John H Pinkerton - Forbes.com

















Home
Business
Tech
Markets
Entrepreneurs
Leadership
Personal Finance
ForbesLife
Lists
Opinions
Video
Blogs
E-mail Newsletters
People Tracker
Portfolio Tracker
Special Reports
Commerce
Energy
Health Care
Logistics
Manufacturing
Media
Services
Technology
Wall Street
Washington
CIO Network
Enterprise Tech
Infoimaging
Internet Infrastructure
Internet
Personal Tech
Sciences
Security
Wireless
Bonds
Commodities
Currencies
Economy
Emerging Markets
Equities
Options
Finance
Human Resources
Law & Taxation
Sales & Marketing
Management
Technology
Careers
Compensation
Corporate Citizenship
Corporate Governance
Managing
Innovation
CEO Network
Reference
ETFs
Guru Insights
Investing Ideas
Investor Education
Mutual Funds
Philanthropy
Retirement & College
Taxes & Estates
Collecting
Health
Real Estate
Sports
Style
Travel
Vehicles
Wine & Food
100 Top Celebrities
400 Richest Americans
Largest Private Cos
World's Richest People
All Forbes Lists
Business Opinions
Investing
Technology Opinions
Washington & The World
Companies
People
Reference
Technology
Companies
Events
People
Reference
Companies
People
Companies
Events
People
Reference
Companies
Events
People
Reference
























CEO Compensation
#196 John H Pinkerton

04.22.09, 06:00 PM EDT




Previous: R David YostNext: Louis A Raspino



Total Compensation

$7.01 mil


5-Year Compensation Total

$26.81 mil


John H Pinkerton has been CEO of Range Resources
(RRC) for 17 years.
Mr. Pinkerton has been with the company for 19 years.
The 55 year old executive ranks 24 within Oil & Gas Operations


Education

College: Texas Christian University BBA

Graduate School: University of Texas Arlington MBA

 
      




Performance Vs. Pay


Rank: 8 / 175   
Range Resources


6-Year Annual Total Return50%


Mr. Pinkerton


6-Year Average Compensation

$4.60 mil6-Year Return Relative to Industry
125


6-Year Return Relative to Market
147


Relative returns: 100 equals the market or industry.
 




John H Pinkerton's Compensation Vs. Oil & Gas Operations Medians


Salary
$0.56 mil 
      
$1.03 mil 



Bonus
$0.95 mil 
$1.17 mil 



Other
$3.51 mil 
$3.25 mil 



Stock Gains
$2.00 mil 
$3.14 mil 






Total Compensation$7.01 mil $10.44 mil 



Range Resources

(RRC: quote,
news, org chart)



100 Throckmorton StreetFort Worth, TX 76102Texas817-870-2601817-870-2316



www.rangeresources.com




John H Pinkerton's Ownership Of Range Resources


Industry Medians



Stock Owned (% of Co)
 0.93% 
0.13% 



Stock Owned
 $62.3 mil 
$0.02 mil 



 



Range Resources's Stock Performance


 



Total Return During Tenure
 15% 



Relative to Market
 108 








			< Previous:R David YostNext:Louis A Raspino >
		



Rank |
	Name |
	Age |
	Company |
	Efficiency

Total Compensation |
	5 Year Compensation |
	Market Value


Methodology: 
Compensation rank is based on total compensation for latest fiscal year. Total compensation for each chief executive includes the following: salary and bonuses; other compensation, such as vested restricted stock grants, LTIP payouts and perks; and stock gains, the value realized by exercising stock options. Efficiency rank is based on our chief executive's performance/pay score. Ranks are given only to chief executives who have a six-year tenure and six-year compensation history. The most efficient rank is 1 and least efficient is 179.


Footnotes: 
Total returns and value of stock owned (including all classes) is based on Apr. 9, 2009 stock price. Compensation percent change is based on combined salary and bonus. Annualized total return during tenure covers the tenure of the executive or from the time of the IPO or available stock history. Relative to market is the ending value of $100 invested in the stock, divided by the ending value of $1 invested in the S&P 500 (a score of 100 = the S&P 500). NA: Not available or not applicable.

1Annualized.

2Four-year total.

3Three-year total.

4Less than 0.01%.

5Prior-year data.

6New chief executive; compensation may be for another executive office.

7Less than $100,000.

8Received options or restricted stock in lieu of portion of salary.

9Received options or restricted stock in lieu of portion of bonus.

10Includes shares indirectly held.


Sources: Company SEC Filings; FT Interactive Data and LionShares via FactSet Research Systems; Forbes 









The Future Of ETFsFrom Hair Care To BillionaireAmericans' Top Hometown SpotsCEO Spotlight: Sybase







Read All Comments


  Intelligent Investing | Data | Knowledge | Insight | Wisdom








Subscriptions

Subscribe To Newsletters
Subscriber Customer Service


ADVERTISEMENT

						

















































Pinkerton, John H. - The Wall Street Transcript













































 





































John H. Pinkerton
JOHN H. PINKERTON is President, Chief Executive Officer and a Director
of Range Resources Corporation. He became a Director in 1988. He joined
the company and was appointed President in 1990. Previously, Mr.
Pinkerton was a Senior Vice President-Acquisitions of Snyder Oil
Corporation. Prior to joining Snyder Oil Corporation in 1980, Mr.
Pinkerton was with Arthur Andersen. Mr. Pinkerton received his Bachelor
of Arts degree in Business Administration from Texas Christian
University and his Master of Arts degree in Business Administration from
the University of Texas.
Related Interviews:John Pinkerton - Range Resources Corporation (rrc)August 01, 2004JOHN PINKERTON - RANGE RESOURCES CORPORATION (RRC)March 01, 2004John Pinkerton - Range Resources Corporation (rrc)November 26, 2003John Pinkerton - Range Resources Corporation (rrc)December 03, 2002







CartLatest NewsJames Abate of Centre Asset Management Sees Consumer Demand Driving New Stock HighsMalcolm E. Polley of Stewart Capital and How to Play the Health Care StocksTimothy Biltz, CEO of Lumos Networks Identifies the Key Component for Future 5G NetworksThe Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundJames A. Abate Published July 20, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AMAT JNJ COH RL COG NVDA ADBE ATVI KLAC AMZN NFLX GOOG FB GLW MU 005930 000660 WFM JWN CMG GPS EQT RICE SPLS Buy ($25)Finding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesHenry  Beukema Published July 19, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: ORCL MSFT NSRGY AMZN WFM LRLCY AGN LNR Buy ($25)Better Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap SpaceMalcolm E. Polley Published July 18, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: PRAA HURN FII FL NKE AMZN WFM WBA RAD Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsWireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published June 30, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundFinding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesBetter Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap Space 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google














H Pinkerton John - Chillicothe, OH - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



OH



Chillicothe



Detective and Armored Car Services



Detective Agency



                            H Pinkerton John
                                    



 





















H 


H Pinkerton John
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



29 TIMBERLANE DR UNIT TS CHILLICOTHE, OH 45601
Get Directions



(740) 775-8067





Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $70,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Detective Agency
 Contacts John H Pinkerton







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


H Pinkerton John is located at 29 Timberlane Dr Unit Ts in Chillicothe and has been in the business of Detective Agency since 2010. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







H

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















John Howard Pinkerton - Fort Worth, TX | Intelius



























Sign In



We found John Howard Pinkerton in Fort Worth, TX


John Howard Pinkerton

                                                                           Intelius found that John Howard Pinkerton  is  a male between 60 and 70 years old from Fort Worth, TX.  We have connected them to
                12 addresses,
                5 phones,
                and 6 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

J H Pinkerton


Get Report Now

Age

John Howard Pinkerton is in his 60s

John Has Lived In

Fort Worth, TX
Santa Rosa Beach, FL
Graford, TX

John's Relatives

Kathy Pinkerton
Nancy Pinkerton
Ann Pinkerton
Homer Pinkerton







John Howard Pinkerton



Zodiac SignPisces



GenderMale



Professional Status
Trustee at Fort Worth Museum of Science and History



Get Report Now










Want to know more about John? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about John, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on John Howard Pinkerton
Get a Criminal Check on John Howard Pinkerton
Get a Public Record Report on John Howard Pinkerton
Get a People Search Report on John Howard Pinkerton


John Howard Pinkerton's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where John Howard Pinkerton has lived as well as John Howard Pinkerton's phone numbers and email addresses.




John Howard Pinkerton Has Lived in 2 States
Texas Address for John Howard Pinkerton


3562 C****** C* 

Fort Worth, TX


Has Lived In

Fort Worth, TX
Santa Rosa Beach, FL


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with John Howard Pinkerton

(817) ***-**** - Fort Worth, TX 
(817) ***-**** - Fort Worth, TX 
(817) ***-**** - Fort Worth, TX 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with John Howard Pinkerton

j********n@***.com
j*********n@***.com
j*********n@***.com


Get Email Report




John Howard Pinkerton's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about John Howard Pinkerton's academic history.  Find out which schools John Howard Pinkerton attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees John Howard Pinkerton received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


John Howard Pinkerton Has Attended 1 School
Texas A & M Univ - Main Campus 


John Howard Pinkerton's Professional Information
Information regarding John Howard Pinkerton's professional history.  Find out previous places John Howard Pinkerton has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


John Howard Pinkerton Has Worked at 3 Places
Company: Fort Worth Museum of Science and History
               Title: Trustee
Company: Range Resources Corporation
               Title: Executive Chairman
John Howard Pinkerton's Experience
Title: Trustee
               Company: Fort Worth Museum of Science and History
Job Details
               The Museum actively participates in numerous partnerships, which give its exhibits and learning programs national exposure and bring the best exhibits and learning experiences from other museums to Fort Worth. Key partnerships include: the Exploratorium in San Francisco; the Science Museum Exhibit Collaborative, a group of leading science museums that share resources to create world-class exhibits and includes the Science Museum of Minnesota, Museum of Science – Boston, the Franklin Institute, California Science Center, Oregon Museum of Science and Industry, and COSI-Columbus; and the Youth Museum Exhibit Collaborative that groups the Museum with the Minnesota Children's Museum, the Canadian Children's Museum, Brooklyn Children's Museum, The Children's Museum of Memphis, The Children's Museum of Houston, Bay Area Children's Museum, and the Children's Museum in Boston. Since 1992, the Museum has been awarded $4.46 million from the National Science Foundation to support its outstanding exhibitions and programs. NSF only funds significant programs that are innovative and have broad impact. The Museum is recognized as a leader in informal education programming. For nearly 20 years, the Museum has partnered with Southern Methodist University on important paleontological work: from excavating bones and fossils at sites in Texas to preparing the fossils for research and exhibitions. The partnership works this way: SMU's Shuler Museum of Paleontology and the Institute for the Study of Earth and Man conducts the research and publishes scientific papers, the Fort Worth Museum of Science and History interprets and presents the bones and fossils to the public in dynamic, interactive exhibits. The Museum helps prepare students for classroom teaching in the state of Texas through partnerships with four area universities: Texas Christian University, Texas Wesleyan University, University of North Texas and the University of Texas at Arlington. The planetarium has conducted workshops for teachers and students from Texas Tech University and Tarleton State University and also holds labs for more than 1,000 astronomy students from TCU each academic year. Numerous partnerships exist between the Museum and local school districts, including those in Fort Worth and Arlington. The Museum's field trip program is the largest of any institution in North Texas. On a typical day during the school year, more than 1,500 students, teachers and chaperones flood the Museum on field trips. For more than six decades, educators have relied on the Museum to be an educational resource partner. Our hands-on exhibits, Omni Theater, and Noble Planetarium engage students in science and history and provide exciting, mind-expanding learning opportunities.
Title: Executive Chairman
               Company: Range Resources Corporation
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 500 to less than 1,000
Additional Professional Information on John Howard Pinkerton

 See John Howard Pinkerton's LinkedIn Profile



John Howard Pinkerton's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for John Howard Pinkerton


John Howard Pinkerton's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of John Howard Pinkerton's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
John Pinkerton
Username Matches

                  JohnPinkerton
                  PinkertonJohn
                  John.Pinkerton
                  Pinkerton.John
                  John_Pinkerton
                  Pinkerton_John
                  John-Pinkerton
                  Pinkerton-John
                  JPinkerton
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
J Pinkerton







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.















John Pinkerton  Obituary  - Isabella, Oklahoma - Tributes.com















































- ADVERTISEMENT -















		Play Music
	


		Pause Music
	



A
A
A










Tweet





Help





 | 

Login

 | 

Sign Up











 Obituary Search Advanced Search


State
AL
AK
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
PR
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VT
VA
WA
WI
WV
WY

















Obituary   Search

Advanced Search
Browse by Location
Browse Most Recent
Browse by Date
Find a Funeral Home




Celebrity Deaths

Celebrity Death News
Celebrity Deaths by Category
This Week in History
Year in Review





Sympathy Flowersby your Local Florist



CreateObituary


Grief RecoveryCenter



					Start a Family Tree
	                





Find aFuneral Home











Celebrity Obituaries

Review this week's trending celebrity news stories









John H. Pinkerton Obituary
			











Remember
		


John H. Pinkerton



                	October 28, 1939 - February 12, 2014
                	
                	
                		




                    Isabella, Oklahoma
                    



Set a Reminder for the Anniversaryof John's Passing




Forward to Family & Friends




Share a Memory




Print



Contact Support


Upgrade


Death Certificates












Obituary










Share This Obituary

















Make a Memorial Donation

		Tributes.com partners with over 100 national charities. It's easy and secure.
	
Donate











			Obituary
        


Send Condolences


Upgrade


Memory Book











							SignMemory Book
							




							Record An Audio Memory
							




						Light A Candle
						














Sympathy Flowers







John was born on October 28, 1939 and passed away on Wednesday, February 12, 2014.
John was a resident of Isabella, Oklahoma.



			Do you know something about John's life? 
			You can enhance John H. Pinkerton's memory by
			
				upgrading John's public record with words and pictures,
				signing John's memory book,
				recording an audio memory
				or lighting a candle.
			
			The information in this obituary is based on data from the US Government's Social Security Death Index. No further information is available.
			More details on this data source are provided in our Frequently Asked Questions section.










Send Condolences

Previous





Send Flowerss





Send Food





Plant a Tree in the Holy Land





Send a Personalized Card





Plant a Tree in the U.S.



Make a Donation




Send a Soup Gift Basket





Create An Oral History





Support Library





Plant Trees in Israel





Memorial Cards & Bookmarks




Next







SEARCH OTHER SOURCES

















Create An Online Memorial For John H. Pinkerton
The beautiful and interactive Eternal Tribute tells John's life story the way it deserves to be told in words, pictures and video.
Create an online memorial to tell that story for generations to come, creating a permanent place for family and friends to honor the memory of your loved one.
Select An Online Memorial Product:


Photo Obituary
						



Eternal Tribute
					



Military Tribute
					





View Example


View Example


View Example




View Example




$10.00
			
				
		Photo Obituary
		
Share that special photograph of your loved one with everyone. Document family connections, service information, special times and priceless moments for all to remember and cherish forever with support for unlimited copy.

Processing...

Upgrade





View Example




$50.00
			
		
		Eternal Tribute
	

Online multimedia memorial with unlimited pictures, videos, music and more
Elegant, immersive format honors your loved one
Customizable themes, backgrounds and music give it that personal touch
Interactive Guest Book lets everyone share their memories and provide support


Processing...

Upgrade





			Tributes.com online obituaries now support Integrated Fundraisers powered by:
			
			If you create a GiveForward Fundraiser with your online obituary, it will be provided at no charge (a $50 value, discounted at checkout).
		








View Example




$50.00
			
		
		Military Tribute
		
	

Enjoy all the features of the Eternal Tribute
Preserve the memory and sacrifices of a loved one’s national service
Choose from five elegant military branch themes
Highlight military service details
Unlimited photos and military record information


Processing...

Upgrade













				Leave A Memory
			






							SignMemory Book
							




							Record An Audio Memory
							




						Light A Candle
						












Send Condolences




Send Flowerss





Send Food





Plant a Tree in the Holy Land





Send a Personalized Card





Plant a Tree in the U.S.



Make a Donation




Send a Soup Gift Basket





Create An Oral History





Support Library





Plant Trees in Israel





Memorial Cards & Bookmarks


















- ADVERTISEMENT -

















At Tributes.com we believe that Every Life has a Story  that deserves to be told and preserved.
Tributes.com is the online source for current local and national obituary news and a supportive community where friends and family can come together during times of loss and grieving to honor the memories of their loved ones with lasting personal tributes.
© 2017 Tributes, Inc. All rights reserved.

Terms of Use |
Privacy Policy |
Site Map




About

About Us
Media Center
Advertise with Us
Join our Media Network
Visit Legacy.com




Partners

Funeral Home Partners
Television & Radio Partners
Business Partners



Customer Service

FAQ
Contact Us
Latest Obituaries
Pet Tributes



Funeral Homes

Find a Funeral Home
Become a Partner
Partner Information
Funeral Home Central





























Pinkerton (detective agency) - Wikipedia






















 






Pinkerton (detective agency)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Pinkerton Government Services)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Pinkerton detective agency. For the Canadian television show of a similar name about the agency, see The Pinkertons.
"Pinkertons" redirects here. For other uses, see Pinkerton (disambiguation).
"We Never Sleep" redirects here. For the 1917 film starring Harold Lloyd, see We Never Sleep (film).

Pinkerton





Type

Private incorporation


Industry
Private security contractor


Founded
Chicago, Illinois, United States (1850 (1850))


Founder
Allan Pinkerton



Area served

Worldwide


Products
Investigations, employment screening, protective services, security, crisis management, intelligence services


Services
Security management, full-service risk management consulting


Parent
Securitas AB (2003–present)


Website
www.pinkerton.com


Pinkerton, founded as the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, is a private security guard and detective agency established in the United States by Allan Pinkerton in 1850 and currently a subsidiary of Securitas AB.[1] Pinkerton became famous when he claimed to have foiled a plot to assassinate president-elect Abraham Lincoln, who later hired Pinkerton agents for his personal security during the Civil War.[2] Pinkerton's agents performed services ranging from security guarding to private military contracting work. Pinkerton was the largest private law enforcement organization in the world at the height of its power.[3]
During the labor strikes of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, businessmen hired the Pinkerton Agency to infiltrate unions, supply guards, keep strikers and suspected unionists out of factories, and recruit goon squads to intimidate workers. One such confrontation was the Homestead Strike of 1892, in which Pinkerton agents were called in to reinforce the strikebreaking measures of industrialist Henry Clay Frick, acting on behalf of Andrew Carnegie.[4] The ensuing battle between Pinkerton agents and striking workers led to the deaths of seven Pinkerton agents and nine steelworkers.[5] The Pinkertons were also used as guards in coal, iron, and lumber disputes in Illinois, Michigan, New York, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as well as the Great Railroad Strike of 1877 and the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921. The organization was pejoratively called the "Pinks" by its opponents.
The company now operates as "Pinkerton Consulting & Investigations, Inc. d.b.a. Pinkerton Corporate Risk Management", a division of the Swedish security company Securitas AB. The former Government Services division, PGS, now operates as Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc.[6]



Contents


1 Origins
2 Government work
3 Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen
4 Molly Maguires
5 Homestead Strike
6 Detective Frank P. Geyer
7 Steunenberg murder and trial
8 Indiana University
9 Outlaws and competition
10 Badge history
11 Appearance in popular media
12 See also
13 References
14 Further reading
15 External links



Origins[edit]

In the 1850s, Allan Pinkerton met Chicago attorney Edward Rucker in a local Masonic Hall and formed the North-Western Police Agency, later known as the Pinkerton Agency.[7][8][9]
Historian Frank Morn writes: "By the mid-1850s a few businessmen saw the need for greater control over their employees; their solution was to sponsor a private detective system. In February 1855, Allan Pinkerton, after consulting with six midwestern railroads, created such an agency in Chicago."[10]
Government work[edit]




Pinkerton guards escort strikebreakers in Buchtel, Ohio, 1884


In 1871, Congress appropriated $50,000 to the new Department of Justice (DOJ) to form a suborganization devoted to "the detection and prosecution of those guilty of violating federal law." The amount was insufficient for the DOJ to fashion an integral investigating unit, so the DOJ contracted out the services to the Pinkerton National Detective Agency.[11]
However, since passage of the Anti-Pinkerton Act in 1893, federal law has stated that an "individual employed by the Pinkerton Detective Agency, or similar organization, may not be employed by the Government of the United States or the government of the District of Columbia."[12]
Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen[edit]

July 27, 1877: J.J. White, who had been hired as a "Special Officer" during a strike, was shot and killed.[13]
July 19, 1919: Hans Rassmuson, Special Officer, was shot and killed.[14]
March 12, 1924: Frank Miller, Pinkerton Watchman, was shot and killed.[15]

Molly Maguires[edit]
Main article: Molly Maguires
In the 1870s, Franklin B. Gowen, then president of the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad, hired the agency to "investigate" the labor unions in the company's mines. A Pinkerton agent, James McParland, using the alias "James McKenna", infiltrated the Molly Maguires, a 19th-century secret society of mainly Irish-American coal miners, leading to the downfall of the labor organization. The incident inspired Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear (1914-1915). (A Pinkerton agent also appears in a small role in "The Adventure of the Red Circle", a 1911 Holmes story. A 1970 film, The Molly Maguires, was loosely based upon the incident as well; the film starred Richard Harris, Sean Connery and Anthony Zerbe.)




Pinkerton men leaving a barge after their surrender during the Homestead Strike


Homestead Strike[edit]
Main article: Homestead Strike




Frick's letter describing the plans and munitions that will be on the barges when the Pinkertons arrive to confront the strikers in Homestead.


On July 6, 1892, during the Homestead Strike, 300 Pinkerton detectives from New York and Chicago were called in by Carnegie Steel's Henry Clay Frick to protect the Pittsburgh-area mill and strikebreakers. This resulted in a fire fight and siege in which 16 men were killed and 23 others were wounded. To restore order, two brigades of the Pennsylvania militia were called out by the Governor.
As a legacy of the Pinkertons' involvement a bridge connecting the nearby Pittsburgh suburbs of Munhall and Rankin was named Pinkerton's Landing Bridge.
Detective Frank P. Geyer[edit]
In 1895, detective Frank Geyer tracked down the murderer of the three Pitezel children, leading to the eventual trial and execution of the United States' first known serial killer H. H. Holmes. His story is told in his book, The Holmes-Pitezel Case.[16] Pinkertons had previously apprehended Holmes in 1894 in Boston on an outstanding warrant for insurance fraud perpetrated in Chicago.
Steunenberg murder and trial[edit]
Main article: Frank Steunenberg
Harry Orchard was arrested by the Idaho police and confessed to Pinkerton agent James McParland that he assassinated former Governor Frank Steunenberg of Idaho in 1905. Orchard testified, (unsuccessfully) under threat of hanging,[17] against Western Federation of Miners president Big Bill Haywood, naming him as having hired the hit. With a stirring defense by Clarence Darrow, Haywood and the other defendants of the WFM were acquitted in a nationally publicized trial. Orchard received a death sentence, but it was commuted.[18]
Indiana University[edit]




Bogus written and distributed by Indiana University students in 1890. The Pinkerton Agency was hired to find the authors.


In 1890, Indiana University hired the Pinkerton Agency to investigate the authorship of a student "bogus" that had been distributed throughout town. While boguses were not uncommon, this particular one attacked IU faculty and students with such graphic language that Bloomington residents complained. The detective arrived in Bloomington on April 26 and spent nearly two weeks conducting interviews and dispatching regular reports back to the home office. In the end, it was town talk that led to the student authors and not the work of the agent. The seven Beta Theta Pi fraternity brothers were from locally prominent families, including the son of a Trustee, but all were expelled. In 1892, however, the Trustees granted five of the men their degrees and all seven were reinstated in good standing.[19][20]
Outlaws and competition[edit]
Pinkerton agents were hired to track western outlaws Jesse James, the Reno Gang, and the Wild Bunch (including Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid). On March 17, 1874, two Pinkerton Detectives and a deputy sheriff, Edwin P. Daniels,[21] encountered the Younger brothers (associates of the James–Younger Gang); Daniels, John Younger, and one Pinkerton agent were killed. In Union, Missouri a bank was robbed by George Collins, aka Fred Lewis, and Bill Randolph; Pinkerton Detective Chas Schumacher trailed them and was killed. Collins was hanged on March 26, 1904 and Randolph was hanged on May 8, 1905 in Union. Pinkertons were also hired for transporting money and other high quality merchandise between cities and towns, which made them vulnerable to outlaws. Pinkerton agents were usually well paid and well armed.
G.H. Thiel, a former Pinkerton employee, established the Thiel Detective Service Company in St. Louis, Missouri, a competitor to the Pinkerton agency. The Thiel company operated in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico.
Due to its conflicts with labor unions, the word Pinkerton continues to be associated by labor organizers and union members with strikebreaking.[22] Pinkertons, however, moved away from labor spying following revelations publicized by the La Follette Committee hearings in 1937.[23] Pinkerton's criminal detection work also suffered from the police modernization movement, which saw the rise of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the bolstering of detective branches and resources of the public police. Without the labor and criminal investigation work on which Pinkertons thrived for decades, the company became increasingly involved in protection services, and in the 1960s, even the word "Detective" disappeared from the agency's letterhead.[24] In July 2003, Pinkerton was acquired along with longtime rival, the William J. Burns Detective Agency (founded in 1910), by Securitas AB to create Securitas Security Services USA, Inc., one of the largest security companies in the world.
Badge history[edit]

1870–1925—Solid Silver Badge Engraved Lettering
1925–1930—Silver Colored Eagle Badge with Blue Lettering
1930–Present—Gold colored shield with Black Lettering

Appearance in popular media[edit]

Author Beverly Jenkins makes reference to Pinkerton agents in many of her novels including, "Vivid" and "Before the Dawn".
Allan Pinkerton himself and several agents play a vital role in the film American Outlaws (2001), starring Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht as Jesse and Frank James. Pinkerton and his detectives are hired by the owner of the fictional Rock Northern Rail Road to track down Jesse James and his gang following a series of robberies aimed at the owner of the rail road.
Captain Jackson is a Pinkerton who works with the British police in the UK police drama Ripper Street.
The Pinkertons have been mentioned in season 1 and featured in seasons 2 and 3 of the HBO series Deadwood, and also the 1980 movie The Long Riders, where Pinkerton agents are depicted investigating criminal activity of the James brothers.
In "False Colors" the eighth episode of the first season of the 1989 TV show The Young Riders, a detective named Pinkerton is working with the security of a gold shipment.
In the fourth season episode "Havre de Grace" of Boardwalk Empire, the character Roy Phillips is revealed to be a detective working for the agency.
The protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite, Booker DeWitt, is an ex-Pinkerton, known for his violent methods in putting down strikes. Given his description, he was probably part of a goon squad and involved in the Homestead Strike.
The character Captain Homer Jackson in the BBC series Ripper Street is also revealed as an ex-Pinkerton agent in series one.
Two Pinkerton Agents were featured in the movie The Legend of Zorro.
The Pinkertons are featured in the 3:10 to Yuma remake featuring Russell Crowe and Christian Bale, appearing at the start of the film defending a carriage from bandits.
In Ian Fleming's James Bond novels, Felix Leiter worked for Pinkertons.
Three Pinkerton Agents were featured in the first season episode "Husbands & Fathers", of the BBC America show Copper.
In 1966 Irwin Allen series The Time Tunnel on episode 12 "The Death Trap", Mr. Pinkerton, with the help of the two main characters, saved President Lincoln.
In the Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear, Birdy Edwards is a Pinkerton agent. In the Sherlock Holmes novel Moriarty by Anthony Horowitz, Frederick Chase claims to be a Pinkerton agent.
In Penny Dreadful season 1 episode 8 "Grand Guignol" Ethan Chandler is confronted by 2 Pinkerton agents in a bar as his past catches up with him.
In the 1994 western film Bad Girls the three main characters are being tracked down by two Pinkerton agents.
The song "Ballad of a Well-Known Gun" on the 1970 Elton John album Tumbleweed Connection references 'the Pinkertons' – "The Pinkertons pulled out my bags and asked me for my name".
2012 The Hatfields and the McCoys Season 1 Part 1
The song "Book, Saddle, And Go" on the 2013 Clutch album Earth Rocker references 'Pinkerton Man' – "Pinkerton man, murdering bastard, I’m gonna get even, get even with you, Get even with you".
The Pinkertons, a scripted one-hour syndicated starring Angus Macfadyen as Allan Pinkerton, debuted in 2014.[25][26]
Cole Hauser plays Charlie Siringo, a Pinkerton investigating Lizzie Borden, in the 2015 mini-series The Lizzie Borden Chronicles.
In Laird Barron's short story "Bulldozer", the Pinkerton protagonist Jonah Koenig hunts down a wanted criminal who also happens to dabble in profane occult rituals.
Many Louis L'Amour books contain references to the Pinkertons, including Milo Talon
Maria "Belle" Boyd, a lead character in Cherie Priest's steampunk novel Fiddlehead, works for the Pinkerton detective agency.
In the 1997 James Cameron film Titanic, Spicer Lovejoy, Caledon Hockley's valet and bodyguard, was an ex-Pinkerton detective.
In the online game Poptropica, Pinkerton's services are used to catch a thief on Mystery Train Island.
Clive Cussler is often reputed to base his Isaac Bell series' Van Dorn Detective Agency upon the Pinkerton Detective Agency. This is often disputed, however.
In the Canadian-American television drama When Calls the Heart, Pinkerton security officers are employed by the mining company managed by Henry Gowen (Martin Cummins)
Michael Dorn played Mr. Eastman, a detective sent by the Pinkerton Detective Agency to investigate the kidnapping of a wealthy man's wife, in the tenth episode of the second season of the TV series The Dead Man's Gun titled "The Pinkerton", which originally aired on October 30, 1998.

See also[edit]

Anti-union organizations in the United States
Anti-union violence
Baldwin-Felts detective agency
Battle of Blair Mountain
Coal and Iron Police, a Pinkerton-supervised private police force in Pennsylvania
Colorado Labor Wars
George Samuel Dougherty, private detective for the Pinkerton National Detective Agency from 1888–1911
Morris Friedman, author of Pinkerton Labor Spy
Dashiell Hammett, author and former Pinkerton operative
Historian J. Bernard Hogg, public reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question
Industrial Workers of the World
Labor spies
Frank Little, American labor leader; lynched in 1917, allegedly by Pinkerton agents
Murder of workers in labor disputes in the United States
Timothy Webster

References[edit]


^ "Pinkerton Government Services, Inc.: Private Company Information – Businessweek". investing.businessweek.com. Retrieved 24 September 2012. 
^ Green, James (2006). Death in the Haymarket: A Story of Chicago, the First Labor Movement, and the Bombing that Divided Gilded Age America. Pantheon Books. ISBN 0-375-42237-4. p. 43
^ TM Becker (1974). "The place of private police in society: An area of research for the Social Sciences". Social Problems. Social Problems. 21 (3): 438–453. JSTOR 799910. doi:10.1525/sp.1974.21.3.03a00110. 
^ "Strike at Homestead Mill". Public Broadcasting System. Retrieved 27 June 2015. 
^ Krause, Paul (1992). The Battle for Homestead, 1890-1892: Politics, Culture, and Steel. University of Pittsburgh Press. ISBN 0-8229-5466-4.  p.20-21
^ LinkedIn
^ Foner, Eric; Garraty, John Arthur, eds. (Oct 21, 1991). The Reader's Companion to American History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 0-395-51372-3. p. 842
^ Robinson, Charles M (2005). American Frontier Lawmen 1850-1930. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 1-84176-575-9. p. 63
^ Horan, James David; Howard Swiggett (1951). The Pinkerton Story. Putnam. p. 202
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 18
^ Churchill, Ward (Spring 2004). "From the Pinkertons to the PATRIOT Act: The Trajectory of Political Policing in the United States, 1870 to the Present". The New Centennial Review. 4 (1): 1–72. doi:10.1353/ncr.2004.0016. Archived from the original on October 26, 2009. CS1 maint: Unfit url (link)
^ 5 U.S. Code 3108; Public Law 89-554, 80 Stat. 416 (1966); ch. 208 (5th par. under "Public Buildings"), 27 Stat. 591 (1893). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, in U.S. ex rel. Weinberger v. Equifax, 557 F.2d 456 (5th Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1035 (1978), held that "The purpose of the Act and the legislative history reveal that an organization was 'similar' to the Pinkerton Detective Agency only if it offered for hire mercenary, quasi-military forces as strikebreakers and armed guards. It had the secondary effect of deterring any other organization from providing such services lest it be branded a 'similar organization.'" 557 F.2d at 462; see also "GAO Decision B-298370; B-298490, Brian X. Scott (Aug. 18, 2006).". 
^ "White, J.J.". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Rassmuson, Hans". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Miller, Frank". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ ISBN B000RB43NM
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 90
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 140
^ Clark, Thomas D. (1970). Indiana University Midwestern Pioneer: The Early Years. Bloomington & London: Indiana University Press. pp. 257–260. ISBN 0-253-14170-2. 
^ Kellams, Dina (October 12, 2016). "Sincerely Yours: The Pinkerton Detective Agency". Blogging Hoosier History. Indiana University Libraries. Retrieved October 19, 2016. 
^ "Deputy Sheriff Edwin P. Daniels". The Officer Down Memorial Page (ODMP). 
^ Williams, David Ricardo (1998). Call in Pinkerton's: American Detectives at Work for Canada. Toronto: Dundurn Press. ISBN 1-550023-06-3. 
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 188-189
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 192.
^ "The Pinkertons TV Series". Rosetta Media and Buffalo Gal Pictures. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 
^ Andreeva, Nellie (July 23, 2014). "Angus Macfadyen Set To Play Allan Pinkerton In Syndicated Drama Series ‘The Pinkertons’". Deadline Hollywood. Penske Business Media, LLC. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 


Further reading[edit]


Distler, A. David (2008). Anarchy in the Heartland-The Reno Gang Saga (A. Pinkerton & Sons direct involvement in 1868). Chagrin Falls, Ohio. ISBN 978-0-9705297-1-8. 
Jeffreys-Jones, Rhodri (2003). Cloak and Dollar: A History of American Secret Intelligence. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-10159-7. 
Friedman, Morris (1907). The Pinkerton's Labor Spy. New York: Wilshire Book Co. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 
O'Hara, S. Paul Inventing the Pinkertons; or, Spies, Sleuths, Mercenaries, and Thugs (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2016). x, 194 pp.
Siringo, Charles A. (1912). A Cowboy Detective: A True Story of Twenty-Two Years with a World-Famous Detective Agency. Chicago: W. B. Conkey Company. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Pinkerton National Detective Agency.



Official website
Radio Programme with Professor Ward Churchill





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Pinkerton_(detective_agency)&oldid=782569472"					
Categories: Pinkerton National Detective Agency1850 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in ChicagoCompanies established in 1850MercenariesPrivate detectives and investigatorsPrivate intelligence agenciesLabor-related violence in the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Unfit urlOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaTürkçe 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 May 2017, at 19:38.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Pinkerton (detective agency) - Wikipedia






















 






Pinkerton (detective agency)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Pinkerton Government Services)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Pinkerton detective agency. For the Canadian television show of a similar name about the agency, see The Pinkertons.
"Pinkertons" redirects here. For other uses, see Pinkerton (disambiguation).
"We Never Sleep" redirects here. For the 1917 film starring Harold Lloyd, see We Never Sleep (film).

Pinkerton





Type

Private incorporation


Industry
Private security contractor


Founded
Chicago, Illinois, United States (1850 (1850))


Founder
Allan Pinkerton



Area served

Worldwide


Products
Investigations, employment screening, protective services, security, crisis management, intelligence services


Services
Security management, full-service risk management consulting


Parent
Securitas AB (2003–present)


Website
www.pinkerton.com


Pinkerton, founded as the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, is a private security guard and detective agency established in the United States by Allan Pinkerton in 1850 and currently a subsidiary of Securitas AB.[1] Pinkerton became famous when he claimed to have foiled a plot to assassinate president-elect Abraham Lincoln, who later hired Pinkerton agents for his personal security during the Civil War.[2] Pinkerton's agents performed services ranging from security guarding to private military contracting work. Pinkerton was the largest private law enforcement organization in the world at the height of its power.[3]
During the labor strikes of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, businessmen hired the Pinkerton Agency to infiltrate unions, supply guards, keep strikers and suspected unionists out of factories, and recruit goon squads to intimidate workers. One such confrontation was the Homestead Strike of 1892, in which Pinkerton agents were called in to reinforce the strikebreaking measures of industrialist Henry Clay Frick, acting on behalf of Andrew Carnegie.[4] The ensuing battle between Pinkerton agents and striking workers led to the deaths of seven Pinkerton agents and nine steelworkers.[5] The Pinkertons were also used as guards in coal, iron, and lumber disputes in Illinois, Michigan, New York, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as well as the Great Railroad Strike of 1877 and the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921. The organization was pejoratively called the "Pinks" by its opponents.
The company now operates as "Pinkerton Consulting & Investigations, Inc. d.b.a. Pinkerton Corporate Risk Management", a division of the Swedish security company Securitas AB. The former Government Services division, PGS, now operates as Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc.[6]



Contents


1 Origins
2 Government work
3 Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen
4 Molly Maguires
5 Homestead Strike
6 Detective Frank P. Geyer
7 Steunenberg murder and trial
8 Indiana University
9 Outlaws and competition
10 Badge history
11 Appearance in popular media
12 See also
13 References
14 Further reading
15 External links



Origins[edit]

In the 1850s, Allan Pinkerton met Chicago attorney Edward Rucker in a local Masonic Hall and formed the North-Western Police Agency, later known as the Pinkerton Agency.[7][8][9]
Historian Frank Morn writes: "By the mid-1850s a few businessmen saw the need for greater control over their employees; their solution was to sponsor a private detective system. In February 1855, Allan Pinkerton, after consulting with six midwestern railroads, created such an agency in Chicago."[10]
Government work[edit]




Pinkerton guards escort strikebreakers in Buchtel, Ohio, 1884


In 1871, Congress appropriated $50,000 to the new Department of Justice (DOJ) to form a suborganization devoted to "the detection and prosecution of those guilty of violating federal law." The amount was insufficient for the DOJ to fashion an integral investigating unit, so the DOJ contracted out the services to the Pinkerton National Detective Agency.[11]
However, since passage of the Anti-Pinkerton Act in 1893, federal law has stated that an "individual employed by the Pinkerton Detective Agency, or similar organization, may not be employed by the Government of the United States or the government of the District of Columbia."[12]
Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen[edit]

July 27, 1877: J.J. White, who had been hired as a "Special Officer" during a strike, was shot and killed.[13]
July 19, 1919: Hans Rassmuson, Special Officer, was shot and killed.[14]
March 12, 1924: Frank Miller, Pinkerton Watchman, was shot and killed.[15]

Molly Maguires[edit]
Main article: Molly Maguires
In the 1870s, Franklin B. Gowen, then president of the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad, hired the agency to "investigate" the labor unions in the company's mines. A Pinkerton agent, James McParland, using the alias "James McKenna", infiltrated the Molly Maguires, a 19th-century secret society of mainly Irish-American coal miners, leading to the downfall of the labor organization. The incident inspired Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear (1914-1915). (A Pinkerton agent also appears in a small role in "The Adventure of the Red Circle", a 1911 Holmes story. A 1970 film, The Molly Maguires, was loosely based upon the incident as well; the film starred Richard Harris, Sean Connery and Anthony Zerbe.)




Pinkerton men leaving a barge after their surrender during the Homestead Strike


Homestead Strike[edit]
Main article: Homestead Strike




Frick's letter describing the plans and munitions that will be on the barges when the Pinkertons arrive to confront the strikers in Homestead.


On July 6, 1892, during the Homestead Strike, 300 Pinkerton detectives from New York and Chicago were called in by Carnegie Steel's Henry Clay Frick to protect the Pittsburgh-area mill and strikebreakers. This resulted in a fire fight and siege in which 16 men were killed and 23 others were wounded. To restore order, two brigades of the Pennsylvania militia were called out by the Governor.
As a legacy of the Pinkertons' involvement a bridge connecting the nearby Pittsburgh suburbs of Munhall and Rankin was named Pinkerton's Landing Bridge.
Detective Frank P. Geyer[edit]
In 1895, detective Frank Geyer tracked down the murderer of the three Pitezel children, leading to the eventual trial and execution of the United States' first known serial killer H. H. Holmes. His story is told in his book, The Holmes-Pitezel Case.[16] Pinkertons had previously apprehended Holmes in 1894 in Boston on an outstanding warrant for insurance fraud perpetrated in Chicago.
Steunenberg murder and trial[edit]
Main article: Frank Steunenberg
Harry Orchard was arrested by the Idaho police and confessed to Pinkerton agent James McParland that he assassinated former Governor Frank Steunenberg of Idaho in 1905. Orchard testified, (unsuccessfully) under threat of hanging,[17] against Western Federation of Miners president Big Bill Haywood, naming him as having hired the hit. With a stirring defense by Clarence Darrow, Haywood and the other defendants of the WFM were acquitted in a nationally publicized trial. Orchard received a death sentence, but it was commuted.[18]
Indiana University[edit]




Bogus written and distributed by Indiana University students in 1890. The Pinkerton Agency was hired to find the authors.


In 1890, Indiana University hired the Pinkerton Agency to investigate the authorship of a student "bogus" that had been distributed throughout town. While boguses were not uncommon, this particular one attacked IU faculty and students with such graphic language that Bloomington residents complained. The detective arrived in Bloomington on April 26 and spent nearly two weeks conducting interviews and dispatching regular reports back to the home office. In the end, it was town talk that led to the student authors and not the work of the agent. The seven Beta Theta Pi fraternity brothers were from locally prominent families, including the son of a Trustee, but all were expelled. In 1892, however, the Trustees granted five of the men their degrees and all seven were reinstated in good standing.[19][20]
Outlaws and competition[edit]
Pinkerton agents were hired to track western outlaws Jesse James, the Reno Gang, and the Wild Bunch (including Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid). On March 17, 1874, two Pinkerton Detectives and a deputy sheriff, Edwin P. Daniels,[21] encountered the Younger brothers (associates of the James–Younger Gang); Daniels, John Younger, and one Pinkerton agent were killed. In Union, Missouri a bank was robbed by George Collins, aka Fred Lewis, and Bill Randolph; Pinkerton Detective Chas Schumacher trailed them and was killed. Collins was hanged on March 26, 1904 and Randolph was hanged on May 8, 1905 in Union. Pinkertons were also hired for transporting money and other high quality merchandise between cities and towns, which made them vulnerable to outlaws. Pinkerton agents were usually well paid and well armed.
G.H. Thiel, a former Pinkerton employee, established the Thiel Detective Service Company in St. Louis, Missouri, a competitor to the Pinkerton agency. The Thiel company operated in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico.
Due to its conflicts with labor unions, the word Pinkerton continues to be associated by labor organizers and union members with strikebreaking.[22] Pinkertons, however, moved away from labor spying following revelations publicized by the La Follette Committee hearings in 1937.[23] Pinkerton's criminal detection work also suffered from the police modernization movement, which saw the rise of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the bolstering of detective branches and resources of the public police. Without the labor and criminal investigation work on which Pinkertons thrived for decades, the company became increasingly involved in protection services, and in the 1960s, even the word "Detective" disappeared from the agency's letterhead.[24] In July 2003, Pinkerton was acquired along with longtime rival, the William J. Burns Detective Agency (founded in 1910), by Securitas AB to create Securitas Security Services USA, Inc., one of the largest security companies in the world.
Badge history[edit]

1870–1925—Solid Silver Badge Engraved Lettering
1925–1930—Silver Colored Eagle Badge with Blue Lettering
1930–Present—Gold colored shield with Black Lettering

Appearance in popular media[edit]

Author Beverly Jenkins makes reference to Pinkerton agents in many of her novels including, "Vivid" and "Before the Dawn".
Allan Pinkerton himself and several agents play a vital role in the film American Outlaws (2001), starring Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht as Jesse and Frank James. Pinkerton and his detectives are hired by the owner of the fictional Rock Northern Rail Road to track down Jesse James and his gang following a series of robberies aimed at the owner of the rail road.
Captain Jackson is a Pinkerton who works with the British police in the UK police drama Ripper Street.
The Pinkertons have been mentioned in season 1 and featured in seasons 2 and 3 of the HBO series Deadwood, and also the 1980 movie The Long Riders, where Pinkerton agents are depicted investigating criminal activity of the James brothers.
In "False Colors" the eighth episode of the first season of the 1989 TV show The Young Riders, a detective named Pinkerton is working with the security of a gold shipment.
In the fourth season episode "Havre de Grace" of Boardwalk Empire, the character Roy Phillips is revealed to be a detective working for the agency.
The protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite, Booker DeWitt, is an ex-Pinkerton, known for his violent methods in putting down strikes. Given his description, he was probably part of a goon squad and involved in the Homestead Strike.
The character Captain Homer Jackson in the BBC series Ripper Street is also revealed as an ex-Pinkerton agent in series one.
Two Pinkerton Agents were featured in the movie The Legend of Zorro.
The Pinkertons are featured in the 3:10 to Yuma remake featuring Russell Crowe and Christian Bale, appearing at the start of the film defending a carriage from bandits.
In Ian Fleming's James Bond novels, Felix Leiter worked for Pinkertons.
Three Pinkerton Agents were featured in the first season episode "Husbands & Fathers", of the BBC America show Copper.
In 1966 Irwin Allen series The Time Tunnel on episode 12 "The Death Trap", Mr. Pinkerton, with the help of the two main characters, saved President Lincoln.
In the Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear, Birdy Edwards is a Pinkerton agent. In the Sherlock Holmes novel Moriarty by Anthony Horowitz, Frederick Chase claims to be a Pinkerton agent.
In Penny Dreadful season 1 episode 8 "Grand Guignol" Ethan Chandler is confronted by 2 Pinkerton agents in a bar as his past catches up with him.
In the 1994 western film Bad Girls the three main characters are being tracked down by two Pinkerton agents.
The song "Ballad of a Well-Known Gun" on the 1970 Elton John album Tumbleweed Connection references 'the Pinkertons' – "The Pinkertons pulled out my bags and asked me for my name".
2012 The Hatfields and the McCoys Season 1 Part 1
The song "Book, Saddle, And Go" on the 2013 Clutch album Earth Rocker references 'Pinkerton Man' – "Pinkerton man, murdering bastard, I’m gonna get even, get even with you, Get even with you".
The Pinkertons, a scripted one-hour syndicated starring Angus Macfadyen as Allan Pinkerton, debuted in 2014.[25][26]
Cole Hauser plays Charlie Siringo, a Pinkerton investigating Lizzie Borden, in the 2015 mini-series The Lizzie Borden Chronicles.
In Laird Barron's short story "Bulldozer", the Pinkerton protagonist Jonah Koenig hunts down a wanted criminal who also happens to dabble in profane occult rituals.
Many Louis L'Amour books contain references to the Pinkertons, including Milo Talon
Maria "Belle" Boyd, a lead character in Cherie Priest's steampunk novel Fiddlehead, works for the Pinkerton detective agency.
In the 1997 James Cameron film Titanic, Spicer Lovejoy, Caledon Hockley's valet and bodyguard, was an ex-Pinkerton detective.
In the online game Poptropica, Pinkerton's services are used to catch a thief on Mystery Train Island.
Clive Cussler is often reputed to base his Isaac Bell series' Van Dorn Detective Agency upon the Pinkerton Detective Agency. This is often disputed, however.
In the Canadian-American television drama When Calls the Heart, Pinkerton security officers are employed by the mining company managed by Henry Gowen (Martin Cummins)
Michael Dorn played Mr. Eastman, a detective sent by the Pinkerton Detective Agency to investigate the kidnapping of a wealthy man's wife, in the tenth episode of the second season of the TV series The Dead Man's Gun titled "The Pinkerton", which originally aired on October 30, 1998.

See also[edit]

Anti-union organizations in the United States
Anti-union violence
Baldwin-Felts detective agency
Battle of Blair Mountain
Coal and Iron Police, a Pinkerton-supervised private police force in Pennsylvania
Colorado Labor Wars
George Samuel Dougherty, private detective for the Pinkerton National Detective Agency from 1888–1911
Morris Friedman, author of Pinkerton Labor Spy
Dashiell Hammett, author and former Pinkerton operative
Historian J. Bernard Hogg, public reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question
Industrial Workers of the World
Labor spies
Frank Little, American labor leader; lynched in 1917, allegedly by Pinkerton agents
Murder of workers in labor disputes in the United States
Timothy Webster

References[edit]


^ "Pinkerton Government Services, Inc.: Private Company Information – Businessweek". investing.businessweek.com. Retrieved 24 September 2012. 
^ Green, James (2006). Death in the Haymarket: A Story of Chicago, the First Labor Movement, and the Bombing that Divided Gilded Age America. Pantheon Books. ISBN 0-375-42237-4. p. 43
^ TM Becker (1974). "The place of private police in society: An area of research for the Social Sciences". Social Problems. Social Problems. 21 (3): 438–453. JSTOR 799910. doi:10.1525/sp.1974.21.3.03a00110. 
^ "Strike at Homestead Mill". Public Broadcasting System. Retrieved 27 June 2015. 
^ Krause, Paul (1992). The Battle for Homestead, 1890-1892: Politics, Culture, and Steel. University of Pittsburgh Press. ISBN 0-8229-5466-4.  p.20-21
^ LinkedIn
^ Foner, Eric; Garraty, John Arthur, eds. (Oct 21, 1991). The Reader's Companion to American History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 0-395-51372-3. p. 842
^ Robinson, Charles M (2005). American Frontier Lawmen 1850-1930. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 1-84176-575-9. p. 63
^ Horan, James David; Howard Swiggett (1951). The Pinkerton Story. Putnam. p. 202
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 18
^ Churchill, Ward (Spring 2004). "From the Pinkertons to the PATRIOT Act: The Trajectory of Political Policing in the United States, 1870 to the Present". The New Centennial Review. 4 (1): 1–72. doi:10.1353/ncr.2004.0016. Archived from the original on October 26, 2009. CS1 maint: Unfit url (link)
^ 5 U.S. Code 3108; Public Law 89-554, 80 Stat. 416 (1966); ch. 208 (5th par. under "Public Buildings"), 27 Stat. 591 (1893). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, in U.S. ex rel. Weinberger v. Equifax, 557 F.2d 456 (5th Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1035 (1978), held that "The purpose of the Act and the legislative history reveal that an organization was 'similar' to the Pinkerton Detective Agency only if it offered for hire mercenary, quasi-military forces as strikebreakers and armed guards. It had the secondary effect of deterring any other organization from providing such services lest it be branded a 'similar organization.'" 557 F.2d at 462; see also "GAO Decision B-298370; B-298490, Brian X. Scott (Aug. 18, 2006).". 
^ "White, J.J.". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Rassmuson, Hans". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Miller, Frank". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ ISBN B000RB43NM
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 90
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 140
^ Clark, Thomas D. (1970). Indiana University Midwestern Pioneer: The Early Years. Bloomington & London: Indiana University Press. pp. 257–260. ISBN 0-253-14170-2. 
^ Kellams, Dina (October 12, 2016). "Sincerely Yours: The Pinkerton Detective Agency". Blogging Hoosier History. Indiana University Libraries. Retrieved October 19, 2016. 
^ "Deputy Sheriff Edwin P. Daniels". The Officer Down Memorial Page (ODMP). 
^ Williams, David Ricardo (1998). Call in Pinkerton's: American Detectives at Work for Canada. Toronto: Dundurn Press. ISBN 1-550023-06-3. 
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 188-189
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 192.
^ "The Pinkertons TV Series". Rosetta Media and Buffalo Gal Pictures. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 
^ Andreeva, Nellie (July 23, 2014). "Angus Macfadyen Set To Play Allan Pinkerton In Syndicated Drama Series ‘The Pinkertons’". Deadline Hollywood. Penske Business Media, LLC. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 


Further reading[edit]


Distler, A. David (2008). Anarchy in the Heartland-The Reno Gang Saga (A. Pinkerton & Sons direct involvement in 1868). Chagrin Falls, Ohio. ISBN 978-0-9705297-1-8. 
Jeffreys-Jones, Rhodri (2003). Cloak and Dollar: A History of American Secret Intelligence. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-10159-7. 
Friedman, Morris (1907). The Pinkerton's Labor Spy. New York: Wilshire Book Co. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 
O'Hara, S. Paul Inventing the Pinkertons; or, Spies, Sleuths, Mercenaries, and Thugs (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2016). x, 194 pp.
Siringo, Charles A. (1912). A Cowboy Detective: A True Story of Twenty-Two Years with a World-Famous Detective Agency. Chicago: W. B. Conkey Company. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Pinkerton National Detective Agency.



Official website
Radio Programme with Professor Ward Churchill





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Pinkerton_(detective_agency)&oldid=782569472"					
Categories: Pinkerton National Detective Agency1850 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in ChicagoCompanies established in 1850MercenariesPrivate detectives and investigatorsPrivate intelligence agenciesLabor-related violence in the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Unfit urlOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaTürkçe 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 May 2017, at 19:38.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Pinkerton (detective agency) - Wikipedia






















 






Pinkerton (detective agency)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Pinkerton Government Services)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Pinkerton detective agency. For the Canadian television show of a similar name about the agency, see The Pinkertons.
"Pinkertons" redirects here. For other uses, see Pinkerton (disambiguation).
"We Never Sleep" redirects here. For the 1917 film starring Harold Lloyd, see We Never Sleep (film).

Pinkerton





Type

Private incorporation


Industry
Private security contractor


Founded
Chicago, Illinois, United States (1850 (1850))


Founder
Allan Pinkerton



Area served

Worldwide


Products
Investigations, employment screening, protective services, security, crisis management, intelligence services


Services
Security management, full-service risk management consulting


Parent
Securitas AB (2003–present)


Website
www.pinkerton.com


Pinkerton, founded as the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, is a private security guard and detective agency established in the United States by Allan Pinkerton in 1850 and currently a subsidiary of Securitas AB.[1] Pinkerton became famous when he claimed to have foiled a plot to assassinate president-elect Abraham Lincoln, who later hired Pinkerton agents for his personal security during the Civil War.[2] Pinkerton's agents performed services ranging from security guarding to private military contracting work. Pinkerton was the largest private law enforcement organization in the world at the height of its power.[3]
During the labor strikes of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, businessmen hired the Pinkerton Agency to infiltrate unions, supply guards, keep strikers and suspected unionists out of factories, and recruit goon squads to intimidate workers. One such confrontation was the Homestead Strike of 1892, in which Pinkerton agents were called in to reinforce the strikebreaking measures of industrialist Henry Clay Frick, acting on behalf of Andrew Carnegie.[4] The ensuing battle between Pinkerton agents and striking workers led to the deaths of seven Pinkerton agents and nine steelworkers.[5] The Pinkertons were also used as guards in coal, iron, and lumber disputes in Illinois, Michigan, New York, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as well as the Great Railroad Strike of 1877 and the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921. The organization was pejoratively called the "Pinks" by its opponents.
The company now operates as "Pinkerton Consulting & Investigations, Inc. d.b.a. Pinkerton Corporate Risk Management", a division of the Swedish security company Securitas AB. The former Government Services division, PGS, now operates as Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc.[6]



Contents


1 Origins
2 Government work
3 Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen
4 Molly Maguires
5 Homestead Strike
6 Detective Frank P. Geyer
7 Steunenberg murder and trial
8 Indiana University
9 Outlaws and competition
10 Badge history
11 Appearance in popular media
12 See also
13 References
14 Further reading
15 External links



Origins[edit]

In the 1850s, Allan Pinkerton met Chicago attorney Edward Rucker in a local Masonic Hall and formed the North-Western Police Agency, later known as the Pinkerton Agency.[7][8][9]
Historian Frank Morn writes: "By the mid-1850s a few businessmen saw the need for greater control over their employees; their solution was to sponsor a private detective system. In February 1855, Allan Pinkerton, after consulting with six midwestern railroads, created such an agency in Chicago."[10]
Government work[edit]




Pinkerton guards escort strikebreakers in Buchtel, Ohio, 1884


In 1871, Congress appropriated $50,000 to the new Department of Justice (DOJ) to form a suborganization devoted to "the detection and prosecution of those guilty of violating federal law." The amount was insufficient for the DOJ to fashion an integral investigating unit, so the DOJ contracted out the services to the Pinkerton National Detective Agency.[11]
However, since passage of the Anti-Pinkerton Act in 1893, federal law has stated that an "individual employed by the Pinkerton Detective Agency, or similar organization, may not be employed by the Government of the United States or the government of the District of Columbia."[12]
Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen[edit]

July 27, 1877: J.J. White, who had been hired as a "Special Officer" during a strike, was shot and killed.[13]
July 19, 1919: Hans Rassmuson, Special Officer, was shot and killed.[14]
March 12, 1924: Frank Miller, Pinkerton Watchman, was shot and killed.[15]

Molly Maguires[edit]
Main article: Molly Maguires
In the 1870s, Franklin B. Gowen, then president of the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad, hired the agency to "investigate" the labor unions in the company's mines. A Pinkerton agent, James McParland, using the alias "James McKenna", infiltrated the Molly Maguires, a 19th-century secret society of mainly Irish-American coal miners, leading to the downfall of the labor organization. The incident inspired Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear (1914-1915). (A Pinkerton agent also appears in a small role in "The Adventure of the Red Circle", a 1911 Holmes story. A 1970 film, The Molly Maguires, was loosely based upon the incident as well; the film starred Richard Harris, Sean Connery and Anthony Zerbe.)




Pinkerton men leaving a barge after their surrender during the Homestead Strike


Homestead Strike[edit]
Main article: Homestead Strike




Frick's letter describing the plans and munitions that will be on the barges when the Pinkertons arrive to confront the strikers in Homestead.


On July 6, 1892, during the Homestead Strike, 300 Pinkerton detectives from New York and Chicago were called in by Carnegie Steel's Henry Clay Frick to protect the Pittsburgh-area mill and strikebreakers. This resulted in a fire fight and siege in which 16 men were killed and 23 others were wounded. To restore order, two brigades of the Pennsylvania militia were called out by the Governor.
As a legacy of the Pinkertons' involvement a bridge connecting the nearby Pittsburgh suburbs of Munhall and Rankin was named Pinkerton's Landing Bridge.
Detective Frank P. Geyer[edit]
In 1895, detective Frank Geyer tracked down the murderer of the three Pitezel children, leading to the eventual trial and execution of the United States' first known serial killer H. H. Holmes. His story is told in his book, The Holmes-Pitezel Case.[16] Pinkertons had previously apprehended Holmes in 1894 in Boston on an outstanding warrant for insurance fraud perpetrated in Chicago.
Steunenberg murder and trial[edit]
Main article: Frank Steunenberg
Harry Orchard was arrested by the Idaho police and confessed to Pinkerton agent James McParland that he assassinated former Governor Frank Steunenberg of Idaho in 1905. Orchard testified, (unsuccessfully) under threat of hanging,[17] against Western Federation of Miners president Big Bill Haywood, naming him as having hired the hit. With a stirring defense by Clarence Darrow, Haywood and the other defendants of the WFM were acquitted in a nationally publicized trial. Orchard received a death sentence, but it was commuted.[18]
Indiana University[edit]




Bogus written and distributed by Indiana University students in 1890. The Pinkerton Agency was hired to find the authors.


In 1890, Indiana University hired the Pinkerton Agency to investigate the authorship of a student "bogus" that had been distributed throughout town. While boguses were not uncommon, this particular one attacked IU faculty and students with such graphic language that Bloomington residents complained. The detective arrived in Bloomington on April 26 and spent nearly two weeks conducting interviews and dispatching regular reports back to the home office. In the end, it was town talk that led to the student authors and not the work of the agent. The seven Beta Theta Pi fraternity brothers were from locally prominent families, including the son of a Trustee, but all were expelled. In 1892, however, the Trustees granted five of the men their degrees and all seven were reinstated in good standing.[19][20]
Outlaws and competition[edit]
Pinkerton agents were hired to track western outlaws Jesse James, the Reno Gang, and the Wild Bunch (including Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid). On March 17, 1874, two Pinkerton Detectives and a deputy sheriff, Edwin P. Daniels,[21] encountered the Younger brothers (associates of the James–Younger Gang); Daniels, John Younger, and one Pinkerton agent were killed. In Union, Missouri a bank was robbed by George Collins, aka Fred Lewis, and Bill Randolph; Pinkerton Detective Chas Schumacher trailed them and was killed. Collins was hanged on March 26, 1904 and Randolph was hanged on May 8, 1905 in Union. Pinkertons were also hired for transporting money and other high quality merchandise between cities and towns, which made them vulnerable to outlaws. Pinkerton agents were usually well paid and well armed.
G.H. Thiel, a former Pinkerton employee, established the Thiel Detective Service Company in St. Louis, Missouri, a competitor to the Pinkerton agency. The Thiel company operated in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico.
Due to its conflicts with labor unions, the word Pinkerton continues to be associated by labor organizers and union members with strikebreaking.[22] Pinkertons, however, moved away from labor spying following revelations publicized by the La Follette Committee hearings in 1937.[23] Pinkerton's criminal detection work also suffered from the police modernization movement, which saw the rise of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the bolstering of detective branches and resources of the public police. Without the labor and criminal investigation work on which Pinkertons thrived for decades, the company became increasingly involved in protection services, and in the 1960s, even the word "Detective" disappeared from the agency's letterhead.[24] In July 2003, Pinkerton was acquired along with longtime rival, the William J. Burns Detective Agency (founded in 1910), by Securitas AB to create Securitas Security Services USA, Inc., one of the largest security companies in the world.
Badge history[edit]

1870–1925—Solid Silver Badge Engraved Lettering
1925–1930—Silver Colored Eagle Badge with Blue Lettering
1930–Present—Gold colored shield with Black Lettering

Appearance in popular media[edit]

Author Beverly Jenkins makes reference to Pinkerton agents in many of her novels including, "Vivid" and "Before the Dawn".
Allan Pinkerton himself and several agents play a vital role in the film American Outlaws (2001), starring Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht as Jesse and Frank James. Pinkerton and his detectives are hired by the owner of the fictional Rock Northern Rail Road to track down Jesse James and his gang following a series of robberies aimed at the owner of the rail road.
Captain Jackson is a Pinkerton who works with the British police in the UK police drama Ripper Street.
The Pinkertons have been mentioned in season 1 and featured in seasons 2 and 3 of the HBO series Deadwood, and also the 1980 movie The Long Riders, where Pinkerton agents are depicted investigating criminal activity of the James brothers.
In "False Colors" the eighth episode of the first season of the 1989 TV show The Young Riders, a detective named Pinkerton is working with the security of a gold shipment.
In the fourth season episode "Havre de Grace" of Boardwalk Empire, the character Roy Phillips is revealed to be a detective working for the agency.
The protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite, Booker DeWitt, is an ex-Pinkerton, known for his violent methods in putting down strikes. Given his description, he was probably part of a goon squad and involved in the Homestead Strike.
The character Captain Homer Jackson in the BBC series Ripper Street is also revealed as an ex-Pinkerton agent in series one.
Two Pinkerton Agents were featured in the movie The Legend of Zorro.
The Pinkertons are featured in the 3:10 to Yuma remake featuring Russell Crowe and Christian Bale, appearing at the start of the film defending a carriage from bandits.
In Ian Fleming's James Bond novels, Felix Leiter worked for Pinkertons.
Three Pinkerton Agents were featured in the first season episode "Husbands & Fathers", of the BBC America show Copper.
In 1966 Irwin Allen series The Time Tunnel on episode 12 "The Death Trap", Mr. Pinkerton, with the help of the two main characters, saved President Lincoln.
In the Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear, Birdy Edwards is a Pinkerton agent. In the Sherlock Holmes novel Moriarty by Anthony Horowitz, Frederick Chase claims to be a Pinkerton agent.
In Penny Dreadful season 1 episode 8 "Grand Guignol" Ethan Chandler is confronted by 2 Pinkerton agents in a bar as his past catches up with him.
In the 1994 western film Bad Girls the three main characters are being tracked down by two Pinkerton agents.
The song "Ballad of a Well-Known Gun" on the 1970 Elton John album Tumbleweed Connection references 'the Pinkertons' – "The Pinkertons pulled out my bags and asked me for my name".
2012 The Hatfields and the McCoys Season 1 Part 1
The song "Book, Saddle, And Go" on the 2013 Clutch album Earth Rocker references 'Pinkerton Man' – "Pinkerton man, murdering bastard, I’m gonna get even, get even with you, Get even with you".
The Pinkertons, a scripted one-hour syndicated starring Angus Macfadyen as Allan Pinkerton, debuted in 2014.[25][26]
Cole Hauser plays Charlie Siringo, a Pinkerton investigating Lizzie Borden, in the 2015 mini-series The Lizzie Borden Chronicles.
In Laird Barron's short story "Bulldozer", the Pinkerton protagonist Jonah Koenig hunts down a wanted criminal who also happens to dabble in profane occult rituals.
Many Louis L'Amour books contain references to the Pinkertons, including Milo Talon
Maria "Belle" Boyd, a lead character in Cherie Priest's steampunk novel Fiddlehead, works for the Pinkerton detective agency.
In the 1997 James Cameron film Titanic, Spicer Lovejoy, Caledon Hockley's valet and bodyguard, was an ex-Pinkerton detective.
In the online game Poptropica, Pinkerton's services are used to catch a thief on Mystery Train Island.
Clive Cussler is often reputed to base his Isaac Bell series' Van Dorn Detective Agency upon the Pinkerton Detective Agency. This is often disputed, however.
In the Canadian-American television drama When Calls the Heart, Pinkerton security officers are employed by the mining company managed by Henry Gowen (Martin Cummins)
Michael Dorn played Mr. Eastman, a detective sent by the Pinkerton Detective Agency to investigate the kidnapping of a wealthy man's wife, in the tenth episode of the second season of the TV series The Dead Man's Gun titled "The Pinkerton", which originally aired on October 30, 1998.

See also[edit]

Anti-union organizations in the United States
Anti-union violence
Baldwin-Felts detective agency
Battle of Blair Mountain
Coal and Iron Police, a Pinkerton-supervised private police force in Pennsylvania
Colorado Labor Wars
George Samuel Dougherty, private detective for the Pinkerton National Detective Agency from 1888–1911
Morris Friedman, author of Pinkerton Labor Spy
Dashiell Hammett, author and former Pinkerton operative
Historian J. Bernard Hogg, public reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question
Industrial Workers of the World
Labor spies
Frank Little, American labor leader; lynched in 1917, allegedly by Pinkerton agents
Murder of workers in labor disputes in the United States
Timothy Webster

References[edit]


^ "Pinkerton Government Services, Inc.: Private Company Information – Businessweek". investing.businessweek.com. Retrieved 24 September 2012. 
^ Green, James (2006). Death in the Haymarket: A Story of Chicago, the First Labor Movement, and the Bombing that Divided Gilded Age America. Pantheon Books. ISBN 0-375-42237-4. p. 43
^ TM Becker (1974). "The place of private police in society: An area of research for the Social Sciences". Social Problems. Social Problems. 21 (3): 438–453. JSTOR 799910. doi:10.1525/sp.1974.21.3.03a00110. 
^ "Strike at Homestead Mill". Public Broadcasting System. Retrieved 27 June 2015. 
^ Krause, Paul (1992). The Battle for Homestead, 1890-1892: Politics, Culture, and Steel. University of Pittsburgh Press. ISBN 0-8229-5466-4.  p.20-21
^ LinkedIn
^ Foner, Eric; Garraty, John Arthur, eds. (Oct 21, 1991). The Reader's Companion to American History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 0-395-51372-3. p. 842
^ Robinson, Charles M (2005). American Frontier Lawmen 1850-1930. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 1-84176-575-9. p. 63
^ Horan, James David; Howard Swiggett (1951). The Pinkerton Story. Putnam. p. 202
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 18
^ Churchill, Ward (Spring 2004). "From the Pinkertons to the PATRIOT Act: The Trajectory of Political Policing in the United States, 1870 to the Present". The New Centennial Review. 4 (1): 1–72. doi:10.1353/ncr.2004.0016. Archived from the original on October 26, 2009. CS1 maint: Unfit url (link)
^ 5 U.S. Code 3108; Public Law 89-554, 80 Stat. 416 (1966); ch. 208 (5th par. under "Public Buildings"), 27 Stat. 591 (1893). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, in U.S. ex rel. Weinberger v. Equifax, 557 F.2d 456 (5th Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1035 (1978), held that "The purpose of the Act and the legislative history reveal that an organization was 'similar' to the Pinkerton Detective Agency only if it offered for hire mercenary, quasi-military forces as strikebreakers and armed guards. It had the secondary effect of deterring any other organization from providing such services lest it be branded a 'similar organization.'" 557 F.2d at 462; see also "GAO Decision B-298370; B-298490, Brian X. Scott (Aug. 18, 2006).". 
^ "White, J.J.". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Rassmuson, Hans". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Miller, Frank". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ ISBN B000RB43NM
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 90
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 140
^ Clark, Thomas D. (1970). Indiana University Midwestern Pioneer: The Early Years. Bloomington & London: Indiana University Press. pp. 257–260. ISBN 0-253-14170-2. 
^ Kellams, Dina (October 12, 2016). "Sincerely Yours: The Pinkerton Detective Agency". Blogging Hoosier History. Indiana University Libraries. Retrieved October 19, 2016. 
^ "Deputy Sheriff Edwin P. Daniels". The Officer Down Memorial Page (ODMP). 
^ Williams, David Ricardo (1998). Call in Pinkerton's: American Detectives at Work for Canada. Toronto: Dundurn Press. ISBN 1-550023-06-3. 
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 188-189
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 192.
^ "The Pinkertons TV Series". Rosetta Media and Buffalo Gal Pictures. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 
^ Andreeva, Nellie (July 23, 2014). "Angus Macfadyen Set To Play Allan Pinkerton In Syndicated Drama Series ‘The Pinkertons’". Deadline Hollywood. Penske Business Media, LLC. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 


Further reading[edit]


Distler, A. David (2008). Anarchy in the Heartland-The Reno Gang Saga (A. Pinkerton & Sons direct involvement in 1868). Chagrin Falls, Ohio. ISBN 978-0-9705297-1-8. 
Jeffreys-Jones, Rhodri (2003). Cloak and Dollar: A History of American Secret Intelligence. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-10159-7. 
Friedman, Morris (1907). The Pinkerton's Labor Spy. New York: Wilshire Book Co. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 
O'Hara, S. Paul Inventing the Pinkertons; or, Spies, Sleuths, Mercenaries, and Thugs (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2016). x, 194 pp.
Siringo, Charles A. (1912). A Cowboy Detective: A True Story of Twenty-Two Years with a World-Famous Detective Agency. Chicago: W. B. Conkey Company. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Pinkerton National Detective Agency.



Official website
Radio Programme with Professor Ward Churchill





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Pinkerton_(detective_agency)&oldid=782569472"					
Categories: Pinkerton National Detective Agency1850 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in ChicagoCompanies established in 1850MercenariesPrivate detectives and investigatorsPrivate intelligence agenciesLabor-related violence in the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Unfit urlOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaTürkçe 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 May 2017, at 19:38.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Pinkerton (detective agency) - Wikipedia






















 






Pinkerton (detective agency)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Pinkerton Government Services)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Pinkerton detective agency. For the Canadian television show of a similar name about the agency, see The Pinkertons.
"Pinkertons" redirects here. For other uses, see Pinkerton (disambiguation).
"We Never Sleep" redirects here. For the 1917 film starring Harold Lloyd, see We Never Sleep (film).

Pinkerton





Type

Private incorporation


Industry
Private security contractor


Founded
Chicago, Illinois, United States (1850 (1850))


Founder
Allan Pinkerton



Area served

Worldwide


Products
Investigations, employment screening, protective services, security, crisis management, intelligence services


Services
Security management, full-service risk management consulting


Parent
Securitas AB (2003–present)


Website
www.pinkerton.com


Pinkerton, founded as the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, is a private security guard and detective agency established in the United States by Allan Pinkerton in 1850 and currently a subsidiary of Securitas AB.[1] Pinkerton became famous when he claimed to have foiled a plot to assassinate president-elect Abraham Lincoln, who later hired Pinkerton agents for his personal security during the Civil War.[2] Pinkerton's agents performed services ranging from security guarding to private military contracting work. Pinkerton was the largest private law enforcement organization in the world at the height of its power.[3]
During the labor strikes of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, businessmen hired the Pinkerton Agency to infiltrate unions, supply guards, keep strikers and suspected unionists out of factories, and recruit goon squads to intimidate workers. One such confrontation was the Homestead Strike of 1892, in which Pinkerton agents were called in to reinforce the strikebreaking measures of industrialist Henry Clay Frick, acting on behalf of Andrew Carnegie.[4] The ensuing battle between Pinkerton agents and striking workers led to the deaths of seven Pinkerton agents and nine steelworkers.[5] The Pinkertons were also used as guards in coal, iron, and lumber disputes in Illinois, Michigan, New York, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as well as the Great Railroad Strike of 1877 and the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921. The organization was pejoratively called the "Pinks" by its opponents.
The company now operates as "Pinkerton Consulting & Investigations, Inc. d.b.a. Pinkerton Corporate Risk Management", a division of the Swedish security company Securitas AB. The former Government Services division, PGS, now operates as Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc.[6]



Contents


1 Origins
2 Government work
3 Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen
4 Molly Maguires
5 Homestead Strike
6 Detective Frank P. Geyer
7 Steunenberg murder and trial
8 Indiana University
9 Outlaws and competition
10 Badge history
11 Appearance in popular media
12 See also
13 References
14 Further reading
15 External links



Origins[edit]

In the 1850s, Allan Pinkerton met Chicago attorney Edward Rucker in a local Masonic Hall and formed the North-Western Police Agency, later known as the Pinkerton Agency.[7][8][9]
Historian Frank Morn writes: "By the mid-1850s a few businessmen saw the need for greater control over their employees; their solution was to sponsor a private detective system. In February 1855, Allan Pinkerton, after consulting with six midwestern railroads, created such an agency in Chicago."[10]
Government work[edit]




Pinkerton guards escort strikebreakers in Buchtel, Ohio, 1884


In 1871, Congress appropriated $50,000 to the new Department of Justice (DOJ) to form a suborganization devoted to "the detection and prosecution of those guilty of violating federal law." The amount was insufficient for the DOJ to fashion an integral investigating unit, so the DOJ contracted out the services to the Pinkerton National Detective Agency.[11]
However, since passage of the Anti-Pinkerton Act in 1893, federal law has stated that an "individual employed by the Pinkerton Detective Agency, or similar organization, may not be employed by the Government of the United States or the government of the District of Columbia."[12]
Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen[edit]

July 27, 1877: J.J. White, who had been hired as a "Special Officer" during a strike, was shot and killed.[13]
July 19, 1919: Hans Rassmuson, Special Officer, was shot and killed.[14]
March 12, 1924: Frank Miller, Pinkerton Watchman, was shot and killed.[15]

Molly Maguires[edit]
Main article: Molly Maguires
In the 1870s, Franklin B. Gowen, then president of the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad, hired the agency to "investigate" the labor unions in the company's mines. A Pinkerton agent, James McParland, using the alias "James McKenna", infiltrated the Molly Maguires, a 19th-century secret society of mainly Irish-American coal miners, leading to the downfall of the labor organization. The incident inspired Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear (1914-1915). (A Pinkerton agent also appears in a small role in "The Adventure of the Red Circle", a 1911 Holmes story. A 1970 film, The Molly Maguires, was loosely based upon the incident as well; the film starred Richard Harris, Sean Connery and Anthony Zerbe.)




Pinkerton men leaving a barge after their surrender during the Homestead Strike


Homestead Strike[edit]
Main article: Homestead Strike




Frick's letter describing the plans and munitions that will be on the barges when the Pinkertons arrive to confront the strikers in Homestead.


On July 6, 1892, during the Homestead Strike, 300 Pinkerton detectives from New York and Chicago were called in by Carnegie Steel's Henry Clay Frick to protect the Pittsburgh-area mill and strikebreakers. This resulted in a fire fight and siege in which 16 men were killed and 23 others were wounded. To restore order, two brigades of the Pennsylvania militia were called out by the Governor.
As a legacy of the Pinkertons' involvement a bridge connecting the nearby Pittsburgh suburbs of Munhall and Rankin was named Pinkerton's Landing Bridge.
Detective Frank P. Geyer[edit]
In 1895, detective Frank Geyer tracked down the murderer of the three Pitezel children, leading to the eventual trial and execution of the United States' first known serial killer H. H. Holmes. His story is told in his book, The Holmes-Pitezel Case.[16] Pinkertons had previously apprehended Holmes in 1894 in Boston on an outstanding warrant for insurance fraud perpetrated in Chicago.
Steunenberg murder and trial[edit]
Main article: Frank Steunenberg
Harry Orchard was arrested by the Idaho police and confessed to Pinkerton agent James McParland that he assassinated former Governor Frank Steunenberg of Idaho in 1905. Orchard testified, (unsuccessfully) under threat of hanging,[17] against Western Federation of Miners president Big Bill Haywood, naming him as having hired the hit. With a stirring defense by Clarence Darrow, Haywood and the other defendants of the WFM were acquitted in a nationally publicized trial. Orchard received a death sentence, but it was commuted.[18]
Indiana University[edit]




Bogus written and distributed by Indiana University students in 1890. The Pinkerton Agency was hired to find the authors.


In 1890, Indiana University hired the Pinkerton Agency to investigate the authorship of a student "bogus" that had been distributed throughout town. While boguses were not uncommon, this particular one attacked IU faculty and students with such graphic language that Bloomington residents complained. The detective arrived in Bloomington on April 26 and spent nearly two weeks conducting interviews and dispatching regular reports back to the home office. In the end, it was town talk that led to the student authors and not the work of the agent. The seven Beta Theta Pi fraternity brothers were from locally prominent families, including the son of a Trustee, but all were expelled. In 1892, however, the Trustees granted five of the men their degrees and all seven were reinstated in good standing.[19][20]
Outlaws and competition[edit]
Pinkerton agents were hired to track western outlaws Jesse James, the Reno Gang, and the Wild Bunch (including Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid). On March 17, 1874, two Pinkerton Detectives and a deputy sheriff, Edwin P. Daniels,[21] encountered the Younger brothers (associates of the James–Younger Gang); Daniels, John Younger, and one Pinkerton agent were killed. In Union, Missouri a bank was robbed by George Collins, aka Fred Lewis, and Bill Randolph; Pinkerton Detective Chas Schumacher trailed them and was killed. Collins was hanged on March 26, 1904 and Randolph was hanged on May 8, 1905 in Union. Pinkertons were also hired for transporting money and other high quality merchandise between cities and towns, which made them vulnerable to outlaws. Pinkerton agents were usually well paid and well armed.
G.H. Thiel, a former Pinkerton employee, established the Thiel Detective Service Company in St. Louis, Missouri, a competitor to the Pinkerton agency. The Thiel company operated in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico.
Due to its conflicts with labor unions, the word Pinkerton continues to be associated by labor organizers and union members with strikebreaking.[22] Pinkertons, however, moved away from labor spying following revelations publicized by the La Follette Committee hearings in 1937.[23] Pinkerton's criminal detection work also suffered from the police modernization movement, which saw the rise of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the bolstering of detective branches and resources of the public police. Without the labor and criminal investigation work on which Pinkertons thrived for decades, the company became increasingly involved in protection services, and in the 1960s, even the word "Detective" disappeared from the agency's letterhead.[24] In July 2003, Pinkerton was acquired along with longtime rival, the William J. Burns Detective Agency (founded in 1910), by Securitas AB to create Securitas Security Services USA, Inc., one of the largest security companies in the world.
Badge history[edit]

1870–1925—Solid Silver Badge Engraved Lettering
1925–1930—Silver Colored Eagle Badge with Blue Lettering
1930–Present—Gold colored shield with Black Lettering

Appearance in popular media[edit]

Author Beverly Jenkins makes reference to Pinkerton agents in many of her novels including, "Vivid" and "Before the Dawn".
Allan Pinkerton himself and several agents play a vital role in the film American Outlaws (2001), starring Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht as Jesse and Frank James. Pinkerton and his detectives are hired by the owner of the fictional Rock Northern Rail Road to track down Jesse James and his gang following a series of robberies aimed at the owner of the rail road.
Captain Jackson is a Pinkerton who works with the British police in the UK police drama Ripper Street.
The Pinkertons have been mentioned in season 1 and featured in seasons 2 and 3 of the HBO series Deadwood, and also the 1980 movie The Long Riders, where Pinkerton agents are depicted investigating criminal activity of the James brothers.
In "False Colors" the eighth episode of the first season of the 1989 TV show The Young Riders, a detective named Pinkerton is working with the security of a gold shipment.
In the fourth season episode "Havre de Grace" of Boardwalk Empire, the character Roy Phillips is revealed to be a detective working for the agency.
The protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite, Booker DeWitt, is an ex-Pinkerton, known for his violent methods in putting down strikes. Given his description, he was probably part of a goon squad and involved in the Homestead Strike.
The character Captain Homer Jackson in the BBC series Ripper Street is also revealed as an ex-Pinkerton agent in series one.
Two Pinkerton Agents were featured in the movie The Legend of Zorro.
The Pinkertons are featured in the 3:10 to Yuma remake featuring Russell Crowe and Christian Bale, appearing at the start of the film defending a carriage from bandits.
In Ian Fleming's James Bond novels, Felix Leiter worked for Pinkertons.
Three Pinkerton Agents were featured in the first season episode "Husbands & Fathers", of the BBC America show Copper.
In 1966 Irwin Allen series The Time Tunnel on episode 12 "The Death Trap", Mr. Pinkerton, with the help of the two main characters, saved President Lincoln.
In the Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear, Birdy Edwards is a Pinkerton agent. In the Sherlock Holmes novel Moriarty by Anthony Horowitz, Frederick Chase claims to be a Pinkerton agent.
In Penny Dreadful season 1 episode 8 "Grand Guignol" Ethan Chandler is confronted by 2 Pinkerton agents in a bar as his past catches up with him.
In the 1994 western film Bad Girls the three main characters are being tracked down by two Pinkerton agents.
The song "Ballad of a Well-Known Gun" on the 1970 Elton John album Tumbleweed Connection references 'the Pinkertons' – "The Pinkertons pulled out my bags and asked me for my name".
2012 The Hatfields and the McCoys Season 1 Part 1
The song "Book, Saddle, And Go" on the 2013 Clutch album Earth Rocker references 'Pinkerton Man' – "Pinkerton man, murdering bastard, I’m gonna get even, get even with you, Get even with you".
The Pinkertons, a scripted one-hour syndicated starring Angus Macfadyen as Allan Pinkerton, debuted in 2014.[25][26]
Cole Hauser plays Charlie Siringo, a Pinkerton investigating Lizzie Borden, in the 2015 mini-series The Lizzie Borden Chronicles.
In Laird Barron's short story "Bulldozer", the Pinkerton protagonist Jonah Koenig hunts down a wanted criminal who also happens to dabble in profane occult rituals.
Many Louis L'Amour books contain references to the Pinkertons, including Milo Talon
Maria "Belle" Boyd, a lead character in Cherie Priest's steampunk novel Fiddlehead, works for the Pinkerton detective agency.
In the 1997 James Cameron film Titanic, Spicer Lovejoy, Caledon Hockley's valet and bodyguard, was an ex-Pinkerton detective.
In the online game Poptropica, Pinkerton's services are used to catch a thief on Mystery Train Island.
Clive Cussler is often reputed to base his Isaac Bell series' Van Dorn Detective Agency upon the Pinkerton Detective Agency. This is often disputed, however.
In the Canadian-American television drama When Calls the Heart, Pinkerton security officers are employed by the mining company managed by Henry Gowen (Martin Cummins)
Michael Dorn played Mr. Eastman, a detective sent by the Pinkerton Detective Agency to investigate the kidnapping of a wealthy man's wife, in the tenth episode of the second season of the TV series The Dead Man's Gun titled "The Pinkerton", which originally aired on October 30, 1998.

See also[edit]

Anti-union organizations in the United States
Anti-union violence
Baldwin-Felts detective agency
Battle of Blair Mountain
Coal and Iron Police, a Pinkerton-supervised private police force in Pennsylvania
Colorado Labor Wars
George Samuel Dougherty, private detective for the Pinkerton National Detective Agency from 1888–1911
Morris Friedman, author of Pinkerton Labor Spy
Dashiell Hammett, author and former Pinkerton operative
Historian J. Bernard Hogg, public reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question
Industrial Workers of the World
Labor spies
Frank Little, American labor leader; lynched in 1917, allegedly by Pinkerton agents
Murder of workers in labor disputes in the United States
Timothy Webster

References[edit]


^ "Pinkerton Government Services, Inc.: Private Company Information – Businessweek". investing.businessweek.com. Retrieved 24 September 2012. 
^ Green, James (2006). Death in the Haymarket: A Story of Chicago, the First Labor Movement, and the Bombing that Divided Gilded Age America. Pantheon Books. ISBN 0-375-42237-4. p. 43
^ TM Becker (1974). "The place of private police in society: An area of research for the Social Sciences". Social Problems. Social Problems. 21 (3): 438–453. JSTOR 799910. doi:10.1525/sp.1974.21.3.03a00110. 
^ "Strike at Homestead Mill". Public Broadcasting System. Retrieved 27 June 2015. 
^ Krause, Paul (1992). The Battle for Homestead, 1890-1892: Politics, Culture, and Steel. University of Pittsburgh Press. ISBN 0-8229-5466-4.  p.20-21
^ LinkedIn
^ Foner, Eric; Garraty, John Arthur, eds. (Oct 21, 1991). The Reader's Companion to American History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 0-395-51372-3. p. 842
^ Robinson, Charles M (2005). American Frontier Lawmen 1850-1930. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 1-84176-575-9. p. 63
^ Horan, James David; Howard Swiggett (1951). The Pinkerton Story. Putnam. p. 202
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 18
^ Churchill, Ward (Spring 2004). "From the Pinkertons to the PATRIOT Act: The Trajectory of Political Policing in the United States, 1870 to the Present". The New Centennial Review. 4 (1): 1–72. doi:10.1353/ncr.2004.0016. Archived from the original on October 26, 2009. CS1 maint: Unfit url (link)
^ 5 U.S. Code 3108; Public Law 89-554, 80 Stat. 416 (1966); ch. 208 (5th par. under "Public Buildings"), 27 Stat. 591 (1893). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, in U.S. ex rel. Weinberger v. Equifax, 557 F.2d 456 (5th Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1035 (1978), held that "The purpose of the Act and the legislative history reveal that an organization was 'similar' to the Pinkerton Detective Agency only if it offered for hire mercenary, quasi-military forces as strikebreakers and armed guards. It had the secondary effect of deterring any other organization from providing such services lest it be branded a 'similar organization.'" 557 F.2d at 462; see also "GAO Decision B-298370; B-298490, Brian X. Scott (Aug. 18, 2006).". 
^ "White, J.J.". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Rassmuson, Hans". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Miller, Frank". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ ISBN B000RB43NM
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 90
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 140
^ Clark, Thomas D. (1970). Indiana University Midwestern Pioneer: The Early Years. Bloomington & London: Indiana University Press. pp. 257–260. ISBN 0-253-14170-2. 
^ Kellams, Dina (October 12, 2016). "Sincerely Yours: The Pinkerton Detective Agency". Blogging Hoosier History. Indiana University Libraries. Retrieved October 19, 2016. 
^ "Deputy Sheriff Edwin P. Daniels". The Officer Down Memorial Page (ODMP). 
^ Williams, David Ricardo (1998). Call in Pinkerton's: American Detectives at Work for Canada. Toronto: Dundurn Press. ISBN 1-550023-06-3. 
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 188-189
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 192.
^ "The Pinkertons TV Series". Rosetta Media and Buffalo Gal Pictures. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 
^ Andreeva, Nellie (July 23, 2014). "Angus Macfadyen Set To Play Allan Pinkerton In Syndicated Drama Series ‘The Pinkertons’". Deadline Hollywood. Penske Business Media, LLC. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 


Further reading[edit]


Distler, A. David (2008). Anarchy in the Heartland-The Reno Gang Saga (A. Pinkerton & Sons direct involvement in 1868). Chagrin Falls, Ohio. ISBN 978-0-9705297-1-8. 
Jeffreys-Jones, Rhodri (2003). Cloak and Dollar: A History of American Secret Intelligence. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-10159-7. 
Friedman, Morris (1907). The Pinkerton's Labor Spy. New York: Wilshire Book Co. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 
O'Hara, S. Paul Inventing the Pinkertons; or, Spies, Sleuths, Mercenaries, and Thugs (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2016). x, 194 pp.
Siringo, Charles A. (1912). A Cowboy Detective: A True Story of Twenty-Two Years with a World-Famous Detective Agency. Chicago: W. B. Conkey Company. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Pinkerton National Detective Agency.



Official website
Radio Programme with Professor Ward Churchill





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Pinkerton_(detective_agency)&oldid=782569472"					
Categories: Pinkerton National Detective Agency1850 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in ChicagoCompanies established in 1850MercenariesPrivate detectives and investigatorsPrivate intelligence agenciesLabor-related violence in the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Unfit urlOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaTürkçe 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 May 2017, at 19:38.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Pinkerton (detective agency) - Wikipedia






















 






Pinkerton (detective agency)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Pinkerton Government Services)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Pinkerton detective agency. For the Canadian television show of a similar name about the agency, see The Pinkertons.
"Pinkertons" redirects here. For other uses, see Pinkerton (disambiguation).
"We Never Sleep" redirects here. For the 1917 film starring Harold Lloyd, see We Never Sleep (film).

Pinkerton





Type

Private incorporation


Industry
Private security contractor


Founded
Chicago, Illinois, United States (1850 (1850))


Founder
Allan Pinkerton



Area served

Worldwide


Products
Investigations, employment screening, protective services, security, crisis management, intelligence services


Services
Security management, full-service risk management consulting


Parent
Securitas AB (2003–present)


Website
www.pinkerton.com


Pinkerton, founded as the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, is a private security guard and detective agency established in the United States by Allan Pinkerton in 1850 and currently a subsidiary of Securitas AB.[1] Pinkerton became famous when he claimed to have foiled a plot to assassinate president-elect Abraham Lincoln, who later hired Pinkerton agents for his personal security during the Civil War.[2] Pinkerton's agents performed services ranging from security guarding to private military contracting work. Pinkerton was the largest private law enforcement organization in the world at the height of its power.[3]
During the labor strikes of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, businessmen hired the Pinkerton Agency to infiltrate unions, supply guards, keep strikers and suspected unionists out of factories, and recruit goon squads to intimidate workers. One such confrontation was the Homestead Strike of 1892, in which Pinkerton agents were called in to reinforce the strikebreaking measures of industrialist Henry Clay Frick, acting on behalf of Andrew Carnegie.[4] The ensuing battle between Pinkerton agents and striking workers led to the deaths of seven Pinkerton agents and nine steelworkers.[5] The Pinkertons were also used as guards in coal, iron, and lumber disputes in Illinois, Michigan, New York, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as well as the Great Railroad Strike of 1877 and the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921. The organization was pejoratively called the "Pinks" by its opponents.
The company now operates as "Pinkerton Consulting & Investigations, Inc. d.b.a. Pinkerton Corporate Risk Management", a division of the Swedish security company Securitas AB. The former Government Services division, PGS, now operates as Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services, Inc.[6]



Contents


1 Origins
2 Government work
3 Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen
4 Molly Maguires
5 Homestead Strike
6 Detective Frank P. Geyer
7 Steunenberg murder and trial
8 Indiana University
9 Outlaws and competition
10 Badge history
11 Appearance in popular media
12 See also
13 References
14 Further reading
15 External links



Origins[edit]

In the 1850s, Allan Pinkerton met Chicago attorney Edward Rucker in a local Masonic Hall and formed the North-Western Police Agency, later known as the Pinkerton Agency.[7][8][9]
Historian Frank Morn writes: "By the mid-1850s a few businessmen saw the need for greater control over their employees; their solution was to sponsor a private detective system. In February 1855, Allan Pinkerton, after consulting with six midwestern railroads, created such an agency in Chicago."[10]
Government work[edit]




Pinkerton guards escort strikebreakers in Buchtel, Ohio, 1884


In 1871, Congress appropriated $50,000 to the new Department of Justice (DOJ) to form a suborganization devoted to "the detection and prosecution of those guilty of violating federal law." The amount was insufficient for the DOJ to fashion an integral investigating unit, so the DOJ contracted out the services to the Pinkerton National Detective Agency.[11]
However, since passage of the Anti-Pinkerton Act in 1893, federal law has stated that an "individual employed by the Pinkerton Detective Agency, or similar organization, may not be employed by the Government of the United States or the government of the District of Columbia."[12]
Chicago "Special Officers" and watchmen[edit]

July 27, 1877: J.J. White, who had been hired as a "Special Officer" during a strike, was shot and killed.[13]
July 19, 1919: Hans Rassmuson, Special Officer, was shot and killed.[14]
March 12, 1924: Frank Miller, Pinkerton Watchman, was shot and killed.[15]

Molly Maguires[edit]
Main article: Molly Maguires
In the 1870s, Franklin B. Gowen, then president of the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad, hired the agency to "investigate" the labor unions in the company's mines. A Pinkerton agent, James McParland, using the alias "James McKenna", infiltrated the Molly Maguires, a 19th-century secret society of mainly Irish-American coal miners, leading to the downfall of the labor organization. The incident inspired Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear (1914-1915). (A Pinkerton agent also appears in a small role in "The Adventure of the Red Circle", a 1911 Holmes story. A 1970 film, The Molly Maguires, was loosely based upon the incident as well; the film starred Richard Harris, Sean Connery and Anthony Zerbe.)




Pinkerton men leaving a barge after their surrender during the Homestead Strike


Homestead Strike[edit]
Main article: Homestead Strike




Frick's letter describing the plans and munitions that will be on the barges when the Pinkertons arrive to confront the strikers in Homestead.


On July 6, 1892, during the Homestead Strike, 300 Pinkerton detectives from New York and Chicago were called in by Carnegie Steel's Henry Clay Frick to protect the Pittsburgh-area mill and strikebreakers. This resulted in a fire fight and siege in which 16 men were killed and 23 others were wounded. To restore order, two brigades of the Pennsylvania militia were called out by the Governor.
As a legacy of the Pinkertons' involvement a bridge connecting the nearby Pittsburgh suburbs of Munhall and Rankin was named Pinkerton's Landing Bridge.
Detective Frank P. Geyer[edit]
In 1895, detective Frank Geyer tracked down the murderer of the three Pitezel children, leading to the eventual trial and execution of the United States' first known serial killer H. H. Holmes. His story is told in his book, The Holmes-Pitezel Case.[16] Pinkertons had previously apprehended Holmes in 1894 in Boston on an outstanding warrant for insurance fraud perpetrated in Chicago.
Steunenberg murder and trial[edit]
Main article: Frank Steunenberg
Harry Orchard was arrested by the Idaho police and confessed to Pinkerton agent James McParland that he assassinated former Governor Frank Steunenberg of Idaho in 1905. Orchard testified, (unsuccessfully) under threat of hanging,[17] against Western Federation of Miners president Big Bill Haywood, naming him as having hired the hit. With a stirring defense by Clarence Darrow, Haywood and the other defendants of the WFM were acquitted in a nationally publicized trial. Orchard received a death sentence, but it was commuted.[18]
Indiana University[edit]




Bogus written and distributed by Indiana University students in 1890. The Pinkerton Agency was hired to find the authors.


In 1890, Indiana University hired the Pinkerton Agency to investigate the authorship of a student "bogus" that had been distributed throughout town. While boguses were not uncommon, this particular one attacked IU faculty and students with such graphic language that Bloomington residents complained. The detective arrived in Bloomington on April 26 and spent nearly two weeks conducting interviews and dispatching regular reports back to the home office. In the end, it was town talk that led to the student authors and not the work of the agent. The seven Beta Theta Pi fraternity brothers were from locally prominent families, including the son of a Trustee, but all were expelled. In 1892, however, the Trustees granted five of the men their degrees and all seven were reinstated in good standing.[19][20]
Outlaws and competition[edit]
Pinkerton agents were hired to track western outlaws Jesse James, the Reno Gang, and the Wild Bunch (including Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid). On March 17, 1874, two Pinkerton Detectives and a deputy sheriff, Edwin P. Daniels,[21] encountered the Younger brothers (associates of the James–Younger Gang); Daniels, John Younger, and one Pinkerton agent were killed. In Union, Missouri a bank was robbed by George Collins, aka Fred Lewis, and Bill Randolph; Pinkerton Detective Chas Schumacher trailed them and was killed. Collins was hanged on March 26, 1904 and Randolph was hanged on May 8, 1905 in Union. Pinkertons were also hired for transporting money and other high quality merchandise between cities and towns, which made them vulnerable to outlaws. Pinkerton agents were usually well paid and well armed.
G.H. Thiel, a former Pinkerton employee, established the Thiel Detective Service Company in St. Louis, Missouri, a competitor to the Pinkerton agency. The Thiel company operated in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico.
Due to its conflicts with labor unions, the word Pinkerton continues to be associated by labor organizers and union members with strikebreaking.[22] Pinkertons, however, moved away from labor spying following revelations publicized by the La Follette Committee hearings in 1937.[23] Pinkerton's criminal detection work also suffered from the police modernization movement, which saw the rise of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the bolstering of detective branches and resources of the public police. Without the labor and criminal investigation work on which Pinkertons thrived for decades, the company became increasingly involved in protection services, and in the 1960s, even the word "Detective" disappeared from the agency's letterhead.[24] In July 2003, Pinkerton was acquired along with longtime rival, the William J. Burns Detective Agency (founded in 1910), by Securitas AB to create Securitas Security Services USA, Inc., one of the largest security companies in the world.
Badge history[edit]

1870–1925—Solid Silver Badge Engraved Lettering
1925–1930—Silver Colored Eagle Badge with Blue Lettering
1930–Present—Gold colored shield with Black Lettering

Appearance in popular media[edit]

Author Beverly Jenkins makes reference to Pinkerton agents in many of her novels including, "Vivid" and "Before the Dawn".
Allan Pinkerton himself and several agents play a vital role in the film American Outlaws (2001), starring Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht as Jesse and Frank James. Pinkerton and his detectives are hired by the owner of the fictional Rock Northern Rail Road to track down Jesse James and his gang following a series of robberies aimed at the owner of the rail road.
Captain Jackson is a Pinkerton who works with the British police in the UK police drama Ripper Street.
The Pinkertons have been mentioned in season 1 and featured in seasons 2 and 3 of the HBO series Deadwood, and also the 1980 movie The Long Riders, where Pinkerton agents are depicted investigating criminal activity of the James brothers.
In "False Colors" the eighth episode of the first season of the 1989 TV show The Young Riders, a detective named Pinkerton is working with the security of a gold shipment.
In the fourth season episode "Havre de Grace" of Boardwalk Empire, the character Roy Phillips is revealed to be a detective working for the agency.
The protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite, Booker DeWitt, is an ex-Pinkerton, known for his violent methods in putting down strikes. Given his description, he was probably part of a goon squad and involved in the Homestead Strike.
The character Captain Homer Jackson in the BBC series Ripper Street is also revealed as an ex-Pinkerton agent in series one.
Two Pinkerton Agents were featured in the movie The Legend of Zorro.
The Pinkertons are featured in the 3:10 to Yuma remake featuring Russell Crowe and Christian Bale, appearing at the start of the film defending a carriage from bandits.
In Ian Fleming's James Bond novels, Felix Leiter worked for Pinkertons.
Three Pinkerton Agents were featured in the first season episode "Husbands & Fathers", of the BBC America show Copper.
In 1966 Irwin Allen series The Time Tunnel on episode 12 "The Death Trap", Mr. Pinkerton, with the help of the two main characters, saved President Lincoln.
In the Sherlock Holmes novel The Valley of Fear, Birdy Edwards is a Pinkerton agent. In the Sherlock Holmes novel Moriarty by Anthony Horowitz, Frederick Chase claims to be a Pinkerton agent.
In Penny Dreadful season 1 episode 8 "Grand Guignol" Ethan Chandler is confronted by 2 Pinkerton agents in a bar as his past catches up with him.
In the 1994 western film Bad Girls the three main characters are being tracked down by two Pinkerton agents.
The song "Ballad of a Well-Known Gun" on the 1970 Elton John album Tumbleweed Connection references 'the Pinkertons' – "The Pinkertons pulled out my bags and asked me for my name".
2012 The Hatfields and the McCoys Season 1 Part 1
The song "Book, Saddle, And Go" on the 2013 Clutch album Earth Rocker references 'Pinkerton Man' – "Pinkerton man, murdering bastard, I’m gonna get even, get even with you, Get even with you".
The Pinkertons, a scripted one-hour syndicated starring Angus Macfadyen as Allan Pinkerton, debuted in 2014.[25][26]
Cole Hauser plays Charlie Siringo, a Pinkerton investigating Lizzie Borden, in the 2015 mini-series The Lizzie Borden Chronicles.
In Laird Barron's short story "Bulldozer", the Pinkerton protagonist Jonah Koenig hunts down a wanted criminal who also happens to dabble in profane occult rituals.
Many Louis L'Amour books contain references to the Pinkertons, including Milo Talon
Maria "Belle" Boyd, a lead character in Cherie Priest's steampunk novel Fiddlehead, works for the Pinkerton detective agency.
In the 1997 James Cameron film Titanic, Spicer Lovejoy, Caledon Hockley's valet and bodyguard, was an ex-Pinkerton detective.
In the online game Poptropica, Pinkerton's services are used to catch a thief on Mystery Train Island.
Clive Cussler is often reputed to base his Isaac Bell series' Van Dorn Detective Agency upon the Pinkerton Detective Agency. This is often disputed, however.
In the Canadian-American television drama When Calls the Heart, Pinkerton security officers are employed by the mining company managed by Henry Gowen (Martin Cummins)
Michael Dorn played Mr. Eastman, a detective sent by the Pinkerton Detective Agency to investigate the kidnapping of a wealthy man's wife, in the tenth episode of the second season of the TV series The Dead Man's Gun titled "The Pinkerton", which originally aired on October 30, 1998.

See also[edit]

Anti-union organizations in the United States
Anti-union violence
Baldwin-Felts detective agency
Battle of Blair Mountain
Coal and Iron Police, a Pinkerton-supervised private police force in Pennsylvania
Colorado Labor Wars
George Samuel Dougherty, private detective for the Pinkerton National Detective Agency from 1888–1911
Morris Friedman, author of Pinkerton Labor Spy
Dashiell Hammett, author and former Pinkerton operative
Historian J. Bernard Hogg, public reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question
Industrial Workers of the World
Labor spies
Frank Little, American labor leader; lynched in 1917, allegedly by Pinkerton agents
Murder of workers in labor disputes in the United States
Timothy Webster

References[edit]


^ "Pinkerton Government Services, Inc.: Private Company Information – Businessweek". investing.businessweek.com. Retrieved 24 September 2012. 
^ Green, James (2006). Death in the Haymarket: A Story of Chicago, the First Labor Movement, and the Bombing that Divided Gilded Age America. Pantheon Books. ISBN 0-375-42237-4. p. 43
^ TM Becker (1974). "The place of private police in society: An area of research for the Social Sciences". Social Problems. Social Problems. 21 (3): 438–453. JSTOR 799910. doi:10.1525/sp.1974.21.3.03a00110. 
^ "Strike at Homestead Mill". Public Broadcasting System. Retrieved 27 June 2015. 
^ Krause, Paul (1992). The Battle for Homestead, 1890-1892: Politics, Culture, and Steel. University of Pittsburgh Press. ISBN 0-8229-5466-4.  p.20-21
^ LinkedIn
^ Foner, Eric; Garraty, John Arthur, eds. (Oct 21, 1991). The Reader's Companion to American History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 0-395-51372-3. p. 842
^ Robinson, Charles M (2005). American Frontier Lawmen 1850-1930. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 1-84176-575-9. p. 63
^ Horan, James David; Howard Swiggett (1951). The Pinkerton Story. Putnam. p. 202
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 18
^ Churchill, Ward (Spring 2004). "From the Pinkertons to the PATRIOT Act: The Trajectory of Political Policing in the United States, 1870 to the Present". The New Centennial Review. 4 (1): 1–72. doi:10.1353/ncr.2004.0016. Archived from the original on October 26, 2009. CS1 maint: Unfit url (link)
^ 5 U.S. Code 3108; Public Law 89-554, 80 Stat. 416 (1966); ch. 208 (5th par. under "Public Buildings"), 27 Stat. 591 (1893). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, in U.S. ex rel. Weinberger v. Equifax, 557 F.2d 456 (5th Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1035 (1978), held that "The purpose of the Act and the legislative history reveal that an organization was 'similar' to the Pinkerton Detective Agency only if it offered for hire mercenary, quasi-military forces as strikebreakers and armed guards. It had the secondary effect of deterring any other organization from providing such services lest it be branded a 'similar organization.'" 557 F.2d at 462; see also "GAO Decision B-298370; B-298490, Brian X. Scott (Aug. 18, 2006).". 
^ "White, J.J.". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Rassmuson, Hans". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ "Miller, Frank". Homicide in Chicago 1870-1930. Retrieved 2011-03-16. 
^ ISBN B000RB43NM
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 90
^ Peter Carlson, Roughneck: The Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, W.W. Norton & Company, 1983, page 140
^ Clark, Thomas D. (1970). Indiana University Midwestern Pioneer: The Early Years. Bloomington & London: Indiana University Press. pp. 257–260. ISBN 0-253-14170-2. 
^ Kellams, Dina (October 12, 2016). "Sincerely Yours: The Pinkerton Detective Agency". Blogging Hoosier History. Indiana University Libraries. Retrieved October 19, 2016. 
^ "Deputy Sheriff Edwin P. Daniels". The Officer Down Memorial Page (ODMP). 
^ Williams, David Ricardo (1998). Call in Pinkerton's: American Detectives at Work for Canada. Toronto: Dundurn Press. ISBN 1-550023-06-3. 
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 188-189
^ Morn, Frank (1982). The Eye That Never Sleeps: A History of the Pinkerton National Detective Agency. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. ISBN 0-253-32086-0.  p. 192.
^ "The Pinkertons TV Series". Rosetta Media and Buffalo Gal Pictures. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 
^ Andreeva, Nellie (July 23, 2014). "Angus Macfadyen Set To Play Allan Pinkerton In Syndicated Drama Series ‘The Pinkertons’". Deadline Hollywood. Penske Business Media, LLC. Retrieved 2014-10-11. 


Further reading[edit]


Distler, A. David (2008). Anarchy in the Heartland-The Reno Gang Saga (A. Pinkerton & Sons direct involvement in 1868). Chagrin Falls, Ohio. ISBN 978-0-9705297-1-8. 
Jeffreys-Jones, Rhodri (2003). Cloak and Dollar: A History of American Secret Intelligence. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-10159-7. 
Friedman, Morris (1907). The Pinkerton's Labor Spy. New York: Wilshire Book Co. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 
O'Hara, S. Paul Inventing the Pinkertons; or, Spies, Sleuths, Mercenaries, and Thugs (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2016). x, 194 pp.
Siringo, Charles A. (1912). A Cowboy Detective: A True Story of Twenty-Two Years with a World-Famous Detective Agency. Chicago: W. B. Conkey Company. Retrieved 2009-07-08. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Pinkerton National Detective Agency.



Official website
Radio Programme with Professor Ward Churchill





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Pinkerton_(detective_agency)&oldid=782569472"					
Categories: Pinkerton National Detective Agency1850 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in ChicagoCompanies established in 1850MercenariesPrivate detectives and investigatorsPrivate intelligence agenciesLabor-related violence in the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Unfit urlOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaTürkçe 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 May 2017, at 19:38.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












JOHN H. PINKERTON — Lonestar Resources





























HOME


MANAGEMENT


ABOUT LONESTAR


EXECUTIVES


OUR FOUNDER


BOARD OF DIRECTORS




INVESTOR RELATIONS


NEWS RELEASES


SEC FILINGS


QUARTERLY REPORTS


ANNUAL REPORTS


COMPANY PRESENTATIONS


RESEARCH COVERAGE


LONESTAR RESOURCES AMERICA, INC.


CONFERENCE CALLS




OPERATIONS


OPERATIONS


EAGLE FORD SHALE


BAKKEN PETROLEUM SYSTEM




SHAREHOLDER INFORMATION


GOVERNANCE


IRS FORMs


SHAREHOLDER FAQs


STOCK INFO


SUBSTANTIAL SHAREHOLDERS




CONTACT


LOCATIONS


CONTACT LONESTAR


SUBSCRIBE












HOME


MANAGEMENT


ABOUT LONESTAR


EXECUTIVES


OUR FOUNDER


BOARD OF DIRECTORS




INVESTOR RELATIONS


NEWS RELEASES


SEC FILINGS


QUARTERLY REPORTS


ANNUAL REPORTS


COMPANY PRESENTATIONS


RESEARCH COVERAGE


LONESTAR RESOURCES AMERICA, INC.


CONFERENCE CALLS




OPERATIONS


OPERATIONS


EAGLE FORD SHALE


BAKKEN PETROLEUM SYSTEM




SHAREHOLDER INFORMATION


GOVERNANCE


IRS FORMs


SHAREHOLDER FAQs


STOCK INFO


SUBSTANTIAL SHAREHOLDERS




CONTACT


LOCATIONS


CONTACT LONESTAR


SUBSCRIBE










Lonestar Resources





We are Lonestar Resources. Unconventional Focus. Operational Excellence.






JOHN H. PINKERTON


FRANK D. BRACKEN III


HENRY B. ELLIS


DANIEL LOCKWOOD


JOHN H. MURRAY


Phillip Z. Pace


DR. CHRIS ROWLAND


STEPHEN OGLESBY


Randy L. Wolsey









John H. Pinkerton 







Mr Pinkerton has served as a Director for Lonestar since August 2014 and became Chairman of the Board in August 2016. He became a director of Range Resources Corporation (NYSE: RRC) in 1988 and was elected Chairman of the Board of Directors of Range in 2008.  He joined Range as President in 1990 and was appointed Chief Executive Officer in 1992.  In 2012, Mr Pinkerton retired as CEO of Range and stepped down as Chairman on January 1, 2015.  Mr Pinkerton remains a director of Range.  Previously, Mr Pinkerton served in various capacities at Snyder Oil Corporation for twelve years, including the position of Senior Vice President.  Mr Pinkerton received his Bachelor of Arts degree in Business Administration from Texas Christian University, where he now serves on the board of trustees, and a Master’s degree from the University of Texas at Arlington.  During his 27-year tenure Range Resources grew from its small cap origins to be a $13 billion dollar enterprise with a pre-eminent position in the Marcellus Shale, in the USA.  As CEO, Mr Pinkerton established the technical expertise to enable a drilling-led strategy complemented by bolt-on acquisitions where synergies would enhance growth.  This resulted in a rapid and impressive increase in the scale of the business, and seven consecutive years of double-digit growth in both production and reserves (adjusted for debt). Mr Pinkerton has widespread skill in the management, acquisition and divestiture of oil and gas properties – including related corporate financing activities – hedging, risk analysis and the evaluation of drilling programs.  He has represented the industry in policy matters, serving on the executive committee of America’s Natural Gas Alliance.  He is a US citizen.  
















John M. Pinkerton - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















John M. Pinkerton
Former VP and Chief Financial Officer at AfterMarket Technology


View Full Profile
Are you John M. Pinkerton? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view John M. Pinkerton's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in John M. Pinkerton's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in John M. Pinkerton's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with John M. Pinkerton through your network of contacts.
												








John M. Pinkerton's Executive Work History


Past
To view John M. Pinkerton's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 M.B.A., 
															University of Wisconsin - Milwaukee


Age
59

 


John M. Pinkerton's Biography



John M. Pinkerton joined us as Manager, Planning and Analysis in 1999, became Corporate Controller in 2000, became an executive officer in 2005 when he was appointed Vice President and Controller, became Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer in 2008 and in December 2009 became Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  Before joining us, Mr. Pinkerton was an independent financial consultant during 1998, and from 1988 to 1998 he was with Grimes Aerospace Company, an international engineering, manufacturing and distribution company, where he held various financial analysis and planning-related positions, including Director, Strategic Pl ...
(Read More)

			John M. Pinkerton joined us as Manager, Planning and Analysis in 1999, became Corporate Controller in 2000, became an executive officer in 2005 when he was appointed Vice President and Controller, became Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer in 2008 and in December 2009 became Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  Before joining us, Mr. Pinkerton was an independent financial consultant during 1998, and from 1988 to 1998 he was with Grimes Aerospace Company, an international engineering, manufacturing and distribution company, where he held various financial analysis and planning-related positions, including Director, Strategic Planning.  From 1980 to 1988, Mr. Pinkerton worked for Cooper Power Systems (a division of Cooper Industries) in various accounting and related positions.  Mr. Pinkerton holds an M.B.A. from the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee and is a certified public accountant (inactive).
		
Source: AfterMarket Technology on 04/28/2010
		
	

 
 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view John M. Pinkerton's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like John M. Pinkerton. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in John M. Pinkerton's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in John M. Pinkerton's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with John M. Pinkerton through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: John M. Pinkerton


















John M. Pinkerton's Connections (19)





Sign up now to view John M. Pinkerton's 19 connections »









Brett O. Dickson
Former Vice President, North American Remanufacturing Operations, AfterMarket Technology









Michael J. Hartnett
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, RBC Bearings Incorporated









William L. Conley
Former President, ATC Logistics, AfterMarket Technology









Donald T. Johnson
Former Chairman, President and CEO, AfterMarket Technology









Joseph Salamunovich
Former Vice President and Secretary, AfterMarket Technology









Edward D. Stewart
Board Member, RBC Bearings Incorporated









Robert L. Evans
Non-Executive Chairman of the Board, Churchill Downs Incorporated









Ashoka Achuthan
Former Chief Financial Officer, Westport Innovations Inc.









John J. Machota
Former Vice President, AfterMarket Technology









F. Antony Francis
Former President, ATC Logistics, AfterMarket Technology








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Jan Koum
Board Member, Facebook, Inc.









Philip L. Milstein
Board Member, The Marcus Corporation












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993













 


John Pinkerton | Professional Profile
 





























 









LinkedIn



















































Main content starts below.




John PinkertonChief Financial Officer | CFO | Providing Strategic/Financial Leadership to Logistics, Manufacturing and SaaS CompaniesLocationGreater Chicago AreaIndustryLogistics and Supply ChainCurrentJP & AssociatesPreviousBigTime Software, Inc., ATC Technology Corporation, Self EmployedEducationUniversity of Wisconsin-Milwaukee - School of Business AdministrationRecommendations4 people have recommended John500+ connectionsView John’s full profile. It's free!Your colleagues, classmates, and 500 million other professionals are on LinkedIn.View John’s Full ProfileJohn’s ActivityPhotoJohn likedSpecial FedEx AnnouncementJohn likedClosed Deal Announcement – Peakstone advises on Automotive...John likedYesterday marked two exciting developments. We’re proud to...John likedMickelson to miss US Open for daughter's graduationJohn likedhttps://lnkd.in/eg5iYwRJohn likedSee all activitySummaryChief Financial Officer (CFO) with extensive experience in financial leadership, analysis and reporting for both private and public companies.Highly effective business partner to the CEO and Executive Leadership TeamUnquestioned business integrity, ethics and values.Results oriented and  trusted leader with a proven ability to lead and manage in a team-based environment. Highly credible communicator.Seeking a CFO role in a mid-sized company in Logistics, Supply Chain, Manufacturing or SaaS.Specialties: Chief Financial Officer, CFO, CPA, MBAChief Accounting Officer, CAO, ControllerStock Offerings, Capital StructureMergers & Acquisitions (M&A)Strategic Leadership, Strategic Planning, Financial LeadershipFinancial Modeling & AnalysisTreasury, Cash & Liquidity Management, Banking RelationshipsSOX, Internal Controls, Internal AuditSEC ReportingInvestor Relations, Analyst RelationsRisk ManagementTax Planning, Tax ReportingLean Manufacturing, Continuous ImprovementSystems ImplementationExperiencePrincipalJP & AssociatesJanuary 2011  –  Present (6 years 7 months)Providing strategic and financial consulting services, including interim CFO services, strategic and financial planning, financial analysis, M&A analysis and due diligence, and financial systems implementation. Chief Financial Officer (CFO)BigTime Software, Inc.2012  –  2014 (2 years)Greater Chicago AreaDeveloper of cloud-based software productivity tools for professional services firms. The company delivers time, billing and practice management software to professional services firms in a variety of industry verticals on a subscription basis.VP and Chief Financial Officer (CFO)ATC Technology Corporation2009  –  2010 (1 year)Greater Chicago Area12 year progressive career with this world class provider of outsourced engineering solutions and supply chain logistics services to the consumer electronics and automotive industries, culminating in the successful sale to GENCO.VP and Chief Accounting Officer (CAO) / Acting Chief Financial Officer (CFO)ATC Technology Corporation2008  –  2009 (1 year)VP & ControllerATC Technology Corporation2005  –  2008 (3 years)Corporate ControllerATC Technology Corporation2000  –  2005 (5 years)Manager, Planning & AnalysisATC Technology Corporation1999  –  2000 (1 year)Independent Financial ConsultantSelf Employed1998  –  1998 (less than a year)Director, Strategic PlanningGrimes Aerospace Company1996  –  1998 (2 years)10 year progressive career with this Forstmann Little portfolio company, culminating in a successful exit and sale to Allied Signal Aerospace.Manager, Strategic PlanningGrimes Aerospace Company1992  –  1996 (4 years)Manager, Financial AnalysisGrimes Aerospace Company1992  –  1992 (less than a year)Manager, Distribution Planning & ServicesGrimes Aerospace Company1990  –  1992 (2 years)Manager, Performance ReportingGrimes Aerospace Company1989  –  1990 (1 year)Manager, Distribution AccountingGrimes Aerospace Company1988  –  1989 (1 year)Supervisor, Cost Accounting and Capital BudgetingCooper Power Systems1980  –  1988 (8 years)Volunteer Experience & CausesBoard of DirectorsHarmony Grove Homeowners Association2010  –  Present (7 years)OrganizationsAICPAMemberStarting July 1997ICPASMemberStarting June 1999CertificationsCPAState of Ohio, License 04-3-35439July 1997  –  PresentCGMASkillsFinancial AnalysisFinancial ModelingRisk ManagementStrategic PlanningManagementFinanceInternal AuditLeadershipInternal ControlsSEC filingsMergers & AcquisitionsBusiness StrategyInvestor RelationsContinuous ImprovementTreasury ManagementSee 26+Strategic LeadershipAccountingM&A experienceCash Flow ForecastingSarbanes-Oxley ActPrivate EquityStart-upsFinancial ReportingProcess ImprovementBusiness Process ImprovementCost AccountingCapital StructureLean ManufacturingFinancial ForecastingDivestituresAuditingLiquidity ManagementTaxAnalyst RelationsSEC reportingSOXFinancial Systems ImplementationBusiness Systems ImplementationBoard ReportingBudgetingForecastingSee lessHow's this translation?Great•Has errorsThanks for your help!EducationUniversity of Wisconsin-Milwaukee - School of Business AdministrationMBA, Business Administration and Management, GeneralMBA, Business Administration and Management, General1983  –  1987University of Wisconsin-MadisonBA, EconomicsBA, Economics1975  –  1979RecommendationsA preview of what LinkedIn members have to say about John:It is my pleasure to write this recommendation for John Pinkerton who joined ATC Technology Corporation in February, 1999.  John, as the CFO, was my partner in running the business day-to-day.  In so many ways, John was the backbone of the ATC financial function and I can think of no higher compliment to pay to him.

I have worked with many financial professionals during the course of my career and I can state objectively that few matched the skill level that John possesses.  As a company, we always took pride in the quality and timeliness of our financial reporting actually receiving accolades from the Street for same.  This is in large measure to John’s credit.  I could rely on whatever set of financials John developed—each time and without question.  He developed an intimate knowledge of ATC’s businesses with a thorough understanding of the factors that drove the financials.  This was invaluable to me in being able to sucessfully run our businesses.  John developed financial models that would be the envy of any company and had a mastery of the puts and takes that drove changes to our financials like no other CFO with whom I have collaborated.  He drove the budgeting process, was vital to our M&A reviews, developed our SEC-mandated reports, and just overall knew the story behind every critical number ATC reported.  

John is a top-notch professional.  Suffice to say, I am grateful to John for his professional service to ATC and feel solidly confident in my recommendation of him for another CFO position.  Any organization would be proud to call John its CFO just as ATC was.  

Todd PetersSee moreSee lessJohn made it a point to give his full attention to his colleagues when asked, and was always generous in spending his time to discuss issues that would arise.  He has an outstanding grasp of accounting principles and a knack for understanding the true nature of business issues, which helped to speed along the process of resolving complex accounting and financial reporting matters.See moreSee lessSign up to see who recommended JohnGroupsSEC Professionals GroupThe CFO Leadership Council ChicagoThe Financial Executives Networking Group - FENG OnlineThe CFO Alliance, An AchieveNext CommunityLinked N Chicago (LiNC)CHICAGO C LEVEL (CCL)Finance Plus: Private Equity, Venture Capital and M&A newsSee 7 moreSmall Business CFOsBrilliant Financial SearchE L I T EDIGITALCFO - The Group For Finance & Tech-Minded Business ProfessionalsThe Strategic CFOLinked Financial ProfessionalsUniversity of Wisconsin-Milwaukee Alumni AssociationSee lessView John’s full profile to...See who you know in commonGet introducedContact John directlyView John’s Full ProfileNot the John you’re looking for? View moreView this profile in another languageEnglishGermanPeople Also ViewedBen BloomVice President at SNC Manufacturing Co. Inc.Kevin J. ConradController/CFO at OrganicLife, LLCScott SpencerPartner at Crowe Horwath LLPJake MatyasChief Operating Officer, BigTime SoftwareStephen HealyChief Executive Officer (CEO) | President | Chief Operating Officer (COO) | VP | General ManagerMark PellCEO/COO/Operations Executive - 3Pl, Supply Chain, Customer Service, Call Centers, Business OperationsDave ShadduckPresidentJack D. DonnellChief Executive OfficerDEBRA FAHEY CPA, MBA, CMA, PMPCFO, Chief Financial Officer, VP Finance,  Controller, Director Finance,CPA, MBA,CMA,PMP ★THE CFO MAKING PROFITS GROW!★ Tom CiardielloTransformational Strategic Sourcing LeaderPublic profile badgeInclude this LinkedIn profile on other websitesView profile badgesFind a different John PinkertonFirst NameLast NameExample:  John PinkertonJohn PinkertonYacht ProvisionsUnited StatesJohn PinkertonPresident/ Founder at Georgia Craft Brewers GuildUnited StatesJohn PinkertonTraderUnited StatesJohn PinkertonUnited StatesJohn PinkertonProject Manager at KVac EnvUnited StatesMore professionals named John PinkertonLinkedIn member directory:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzmoreBrowse members by country























403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.




